


 GOODYEAR TIRE & RUBBER CO /OH/ (Form: 8-K, Received: 12/15/2015 08:51:09) 












	 





	 





	UNITED STATES

	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549



	FORM 8-K






	CURRENT REPORT




	Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934






	 


	 


	 





	Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported):




	 




	December 9, 2015













	The Goodyear Tire & Rubber Company



	__________________________________________

	(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)





	 


	 


	 





	Ohio




	1-1927




	34-0253240






	_____________________

	(State or other jurisdiction




	_____________

	(Commission




	______________

	(I.R.S. Employer






	of incorporation)




	File Number)




	Identification No.)






	  




	 




	 






	200 Innovation Way, Akron, Ohio




	 




	44316-0001






	_________________________________

	(Address of principal executive offices)




	 




	___________

	(Zip Code)










	 


	 


	 





	Registrants telephone number, including area code:




	 




	330-796-2121







	Not Applicable

	______________________________________________

	Former name or former address, if changed since last report



	 




	Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to
	simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any
	of the following provisions:




	[  ]  Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)

	[  ]  Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)

	[  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))

	[  ]  Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))











	Top of the Form














	Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.





	On December 9, 2015, The Goodyear Tire & Rubber Company (the "Company") and its wholly-owned subsidiary, Goodyear Dunlop Tires Europe B.V. ("GDTE"), entered into a purchase agreement with Deutsche Bank AG, London Branch, as representative of the several initial purchasers named therein, for the issuance and sale by GDTE of €250,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of its 3.75% Senior Notes due 2023 (the "Notes"). The Notes are guaranteed by the Company and certain of its wholly-owned U.S. and Canadian subsidiaries that also guarantee its obligations under certain of its senior secured credit facilities and senior unsecured notes (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"). The Notes were offered in a private placement under Rule 144A and Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Securities Act"). The offering and sale of the Notes were not registered under the Securities Act, and the Notes may not be reoffered or resold in the United States absent registration or an applicable exemption from registration requirements. GDTE has applied, through a listing agent, for listing of the Notes on the Official List of the Luxembourg Stock Exchange and admission of the Notes to trading on the Euro MTF Market of the Luxembourg Stock Exchange.


	The Notes were issued on December 15, 2015 pursuant to the Indenture, dated as of December 15, 2015 (the "Indenture"), among GDTE, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors, Deutsche Trustee Company Limited, as trustee (the "Trustee"), Deutsche Bank AG, London Branch, as principal paying agent and transfer agent, and Deutsche Bank Luxembourg S.A., as registrar and Luxembourg paying agent and transfer agent. The Notes are unsecured senior obligations of GDTE and rank equally in right of payment with all of GDTE’s other unsecured senior obligations. The guarantees are the unsecured senior obligations of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors and rank equally in right of payment with all of their respective other unsecured senior obligations. Certain of the Company’s subsidiaries that do not currently guarantee the Notes will be required to guarantee the Notes in the future in the event they guarantee certain specified capital markets indebtedness of GDTE.


	Interest is payable on the Notes on June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning on June 15, 2016. The Notes will mature on December 15, 2023. GDTE may redeem the Notes, in whole or in part, at any time on or after December 15, 2018 at the redemption prices set forth in the Indenture, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date. Prior to December 15, 2018, GDTE may redeem the Notes, in whole or in part, at a redemption price equal to 100% of their principal amount plus a make-whole premium set forth in the Indenture, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date. In addition, prior to December 15, 2018, GDTE may redeem up to 35% of the original aggregate principal amount of the Notes with the net cash proceeds of certain equity offerings at the redemption price set forth in the Indenture, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date. In the event of a change of control, holders of the Notes will have the right, subject to certain conditions specified in the Indenture, to cause GDTE to make an offer to purchase the Notes at a price equal to 101% of their principal amount, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the date of purchase. If certain changes in the law of any relevant taxing jurisdiction, as specified in the Indenture, become effective that would impose withholding taxes or other deductions on the payments on the Notes, GDTE may redeem the Notes in whole, but not in part, at any time, at a redemption price of 100% of their principal amount, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date.


	The terms of the Indenture, among other things, limit the ability of the Company and certain of its subsidiaries, including GDTE, to (i) incur additional indebtedness or issue redeemable preferred stock, (ii) pay dividends, make distributions in respect of the Company’s capital stock or make certain other restricted payments or investments, (iii) incur liens, (iv) sell assets, (v) incur restrictions on the ability of the Company’s subsidiaries to pay dividends or to make other payments to the Company, (vi) enter into transactions with the Company’s affiliates, (vii) enter into sale/leaseback transactions, and (viii) consolidate, merge, sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of their assets. These covenants are subject to a number of important exceptions and qualifications. For example, if the Notes are assigned an investment grade rating by at least two of Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services and Fitch Ratings, Inc., and no default has occurred and is continuing, certain covenants will be suspended and the Company may elect to suspend the subsidiary guarantees.


	The Indenture provides for customary events of default that include (subject in certain cases to customary grace and cure periods), among others: nonpayment of principal or interest, breach of covenants or other agreements in the Indenture, defaults in or failure to pay certain other indebtedness or certain judgments, and certain events of bankruptcy or insolvency. Generally, if an event of default occurs, the Trustee or the holders of at least 25% in principal amount of the then outstanding Notes may declare the principal of and accrued but unpaid interest on all of the Notes to be due and payable.



















	Top of the Form














	SIGNATURES





	Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the
	registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
	undersigned hereunto duly authorized.










	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	 




	 




	The Goodyear Tire & Rubber Company






	  




	 




	 




	 




	 







	December 15, 2015





	 





	By:





	 





	David L. Bialosky








	 




	 




	 




	 









	 




	 




	 




	 





	Name: David L. Bialosky







	 




	 




	 




	 





	Title: Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
















10-Q: WORLD CURRENCY GOLD TRUST - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,830
+33.76
+0.15%






Nasdaq

6,375
-7.51
-0.12%






S&P 500

2,472
-3.32
-0.13%









12:33 A.M. ET


Breaking
      Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
                                





 
12:20 A.M. ET


                                  Tesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
                                





 
7/28


                                  Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
                                





 
7/28


                                  A Wild Week in Washington 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
7/28


                                   Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Americans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      Watch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
                                





 
7/28


Updated
      7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: WORLD CURRENCY GOLD TRUST
    








    By

Published: May 5, 2017 5:07 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results ofOperations  This information should be read in conjunction with the financial statements and notes included in Item 1 of Part I of this Quarterly Report. The discussion and analysis which follows may contain trend analysis and other forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 which reflect our current views with respect to future events and financial results. Words such as "anticipate," "expect," "intend," "plan," "believe," "seek," "outlook" and "estimate" as well as similar words and phrases signify forward-looking statements. World Currency Gold Trust's forward-looking statements are not guarantees of future results and conditions and important factors, risks and uncertainties may cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed in our forward-looking statements.  Organization and Trust Overview  World Currency Gold Trust (the "Trust") was organized as a Delaware statutory trust on August 27, 2014 and is governed by the Third Amended and Restated Agreement and Declaration of Trust ("Declaration of Trust") dated as of January 6, 2017, between WGC USA Asset Management Company, LLC (the "Sponsor") and the Delaware Trust Company (the "Trustee"). The Trust is authorized to issue an unlimited number of shares of beneficial  Table of Contents  interest ("Shares"). The beneficial interest in the Trust may be divided into one or more series. The Trust has established five separate series. The accompanying unaudited financial statements relate to the Trust and the SPDR(R) Long Dollar Gold Trust (the "Fund"), currently the only operational series of the Trust, which commenced operations in the first calendar quarter of 2017. The fiscal year end of both the Trust and the Fund is September 30. The Fund will issue shares of beneficial interest ("Shares"), which represent units of fractional undivided beneficial interest in and ownership of only that Fund. The Trust has had no operations prior to January 27, 2017, other than matters relating to its organization, the registration of the Fund's shares under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the sale and issuance by the Fund on December 19, 2016 to WGC (US) Holdings, Inc., an affiliate of the Sponsor, of 10 Shares of the Fund at an aggregate purchase price of $1,000. The Fund's Shares began trading on the NYSE Arca on January 30, 2017. As of May 4, 2017, the Fund has issued 220,000 shares, which are currently outstanding.  As of the date of this quarterly report, Goldman, Sachs & Co., J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, and UBS Securities LLC are the Authorized Participants. An updated list of Authorized Participants can be obtained from the Administrator or the Sponsor.  The investment objective of the Fund is to seek to track the performance of the Solactive GLD(R) Long USD Gold Index (the "Index"), less Fund expenses. The Index seeks to track the daily performance of a long position in physical gold, as represented by the LBMA Gold Price AM, and a short position in a basket of non-U.S. currencies (i.e., a long U.S. dollar ("USD") exposure versus the basket ("FX Basket")). Those non-U.S. currencies, which are weighted according to the Index, consist of the following: euro, Japanese yen, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Swedish krona and Swiss franc (each, a "Reference Currency").  In general, the USD value of an investment in Shares of the Fund is expected to increase when both the price of gold goes up and the value of the USD increases against the value of the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket (as weighted in the Index). Conversely, the USD value of an investment in Shares, in general, is expected to decrease when the price of gold goes down and the value of the USD decreases against the value of the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket (as weighted in the Index). If the price of gold increases and the value of the USD decreases against the value of the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket, or vice versa, the net impact of these changes will determine the NAV of the Fund on a daily basis.  Table of Contents  Investing in the Shares does not insulate the investor from certain risks, including price volatility. The following chart illustrates the movement in the market price of the Shares and NAV of the Shares against the Index as well as the corresponding gold price (per 1/10 of an oz. of gold) since the day the Shares first began trading on the NYSE Arca:  Share price, NAV& Index v. gold price from January 30, 2017 to March 31, 2017  [[Image Removed: LOGO]]  Gold Delivery Agreement Activity  The Gold Delivery Agreement is an agreement between the Fund and the Gold Delivery Provider pursuant to which gold is delivered to or from the Fund to reflect the Fund's gains and losses with respect to the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket. The amount of gold bullion transferred under the Gold Delivery Agreement (the "Daily Deliverable Amount") essentially is equivalent to the Fund's profit or loss as if the Fund had exchanged the Reference Currencies for USDs in an amount equal to the Fund's holdings of gold bullion on such day. In general, if there is a currency gain (i.e., the value of the USD against the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket increases), the Fund will receive gold bullion. In general, if there is a currency loss (i.e., the value of the USD against the Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket decreases), the Fund will deliver gold bullion. In this manner, the amount of gold bullion held by the Fund will be adjusted to reflect the daily change in the value of Reference Currencies comprising the FX Basket against the USD. For more information about the Gold Delivery Agreement, see Note 2.5.  From January 30, 2017 (the date the shares began trading on the NYSE Arca) to March 31, 2017, the Daily Deliverable Amount (gross less the fee paid to the Gold Delivery Provider) under the Gold Delivery Agreement ranged from 170.453 ounces of gold bullion delivered to 142.074 ounces of gold bullion received, having corresponding market values, respectively, of $209,853 and $178,005. Over that same period, the Fund delivered a net amount of 78.52 ounces of gold bullion, having a corresponding market value of $92,545.  Table of Contents  Critical Accounting Policy  Valuation of Gold, Definition of NAV  The Fund's policy is to value the investment in gold bullion at fair value. The Administrator will value the gold held by the Fund on the basis of the price of an ounce of gold as determined by ICE Benchmark Administration Limited ("IBA"), a benchmark administrator, which provides an independently administered auction process, as well as the overall administration and governance for the LBMA Gold Price. The net asset value ("NAV") of the Fund is the aggregate value of the Fund's assets, including Gold Delivery Agreement less its liabilities. In determining the NAV of the Fund, the Administrator values the gold held by the Fund on the basis of the price of an ounce of gold determined by the IBA 10:30 AM auction process ("LBMA Gold Price AM"), which is an electronic auction, with the imbalance calculated and the price adjusted in rounds (45 seconds in duration). The auction runs twice daily at 10:30 AM and 3:00 PM London time. The Administrator determines the NAV of the Fund on each day the NYSE Arca is open for regular trading, generally as of 12:00 PM New York time. If no LBMA Gold Price AM is made on a particular evaluation day or if the LBMA Gold Price PM has not been announced by 12:00 PM New York time on a particular evaluation day, the next most recent LBMA Gold Price AM will be used in the determination of the NAV of the Fund, unless the Administrator, in consultation with the Sponsor, determines that such price is inappropriate to use as the basis for such determination.  Once the value of the gold has been determined, the Administrator subtracts all estimated accrued expenses and other liabilities of the Fund from the total value of the gold and all other assets of the Fund. The resulting figure is the NAV of the Fund. The NAV of the Fund is used to compute the Sponsor's fee. The Administrator determines the NAV per Share by dividing the NAV of the Fund by the number of Shares outstanding as of the close of trading on NYSE Arca.  Results of Operations  The Fund commenced operations on January 27, 2017 and in the period from then to March 31, 2017, 220,000 Shares (22 Creation Units) were created in exchange for 22,072 ounces of gold, and 10 ounces of gold were sold to pay expenses.  At March 31, 2017, the Custodian held 21,860.2 ounces of gold on behalf of the Fund in its vault, 100% of which is allocated gold in the form of London Good Delivery gold bars including gold payable, if any, with a market value of $27,143,779 (cost - $26,331,803) based on the LBMA Gold Price AM on March 31, 2017. Through the date of this report, (i) 129 ounces of gold were receivable by the Fund in connection with the settlement of the Gold Delivery Agreement and  On March 14, 2017, Inspectorate International Limited, a precious metals auditor, concluded the annual random sample count of the Fund's gold bullion held by the Custodian. The results can be found on www.spdrgoldshares.com.  Cash Resources and Liquidity  At March 31, 2017, the Fund did not have any cash balances. When selling gold to pay expenses, the Administrator endeavors to sell the smallest amount of gold needed to pay expenses in order to minimize the Fund's holdings of assets other than gold. As a consequence, we expect that the Fund will not record any net cash flow from its operations and that its cash balance will be zero at the end of each reporting period.  Analysis of Movements in the Price of Gold  As movements in the price of gold are expected to directly affect the price of the Fund's Shares, investors should understand and follow movements in the price of gold. Investors should be aware that past movements in the gold price are not indicators of future movements.  Table of Contents  The following chart shows movements in the price of gold based on the LBMA Gold Price AM in US dollars per ounce over the period from January 30, 2017 (the first date Shares began trading on the NYSE Arca) to March 31, 2017.  Daily gold price - January 30, 2017 to March 31, 2017  [[Image Removed: LOGO]]  The average, high, low and end-of-periodgold prices for the period from January 30, 2017 through March 31, 2017, based on the LBMA Gold Price AM were:   Last End of business Period Average High Date Low Date period day(1) January 30, 2017 to March 31, 2017 $ 1,230.10 $ 1,256.90 Mar 27, 2017 $ 1,189.85 Jan 30, 2017 $ 1,241.70 Mar 31, 2017  (1) The end of period gold price is the LBMA Gold Price AM on the last business day of the period. This is in accordance with the Declaration of Trust and the basis used for calculating the NAV of the Fund.  May 05, 2017  (c) 1995-2017 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range


Why it might be time to invest in the companies Amazon is destroying


RIP, myRA: a good idea with terrible execution















Most Popular





Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials





Kellyanne Conway suggests Hillary Clinton’s language is more vulgar than Anthony Scaramucci’s





Elon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range





Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400





Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 



















Forbes WelcomeCLOSE   More Options   Quote of the Day  Nothing is invented, for it’s written in nature first. Antoni Gaudí, Architect    


MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




3:46 AM EDT
July 29, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:34aBREAKINGElon Musk details Tesla Model 3 pricing, range
12:21aTesla: Standard Model 3 will cost $35,000, long-range model will cost $44,000
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































GLDW Stock Quote - World Currency Gold Trust Long Dollar Gold Trust
























































What We Offer

Impact Portfolio
Trading Account
IPOs



Why Motif


Who We Are

About Us
Leadership
Press
Careers



Resources

Explore Motifs
Blog
FAQ









Log In
Open Account



Log In
Open Account














GLDW


                    World Currency Gold Trust Long Dollar Gold Trust - GLDW (NYSE-ARCA) 


                        117.65                                            

0.32 (0.28%) 


	                	                Quotes delayed 15 mins. Currently July 29, 2017 3:46:35 AM   
                


Sign Up To Buy This Stock
By signing up, you can buy this stock for just $4.95 or purchase it within a Motif






Key Financials

Day Range:117.24 - 117.65
52 Week Range:114.86 - 130.42
Open:117.24
Shares:160,000.00
Market Cap:18.82M
EPS:--
P/E Ratio:--
Div Yield:-- 


                    Performance
                


Previous close


No Chart Available





Purchase GLDW in a Motif

                A motif is an intelligently weighted basket of up to 30 stocks and ETFs built around themes and investing styles.
                
                On our platform, you can buy shares of GLDW not only as a single stock, but also as part of a motif.
            




Community Motifs with GLDW




Watts Diversified Factor Allocation
8.5% 1 YR RTN






Robert's Motif 8
-- 1 YR RTN






PPA: Currency Hedged World
-- 1 YR RTN


View all community motifs with GLDW





News About GLDW

Barrick Gold: Is It Time To Buy?
Seeking Alpha (Fri, Jul 28)


Gold's Resilience Remarkable As GLD Holding Falls Further
Seeking Alpha (Fri, Jul 28)


Gold slips, even with dollar lower, ahead of GDP report expected to show a rebound
MarketWatch (Fri, Jul 28)


Commodity Currencies: The Australian And Canadian Dollars
Seeking Alpha (Fri, Jul 28)


Barrick Gold Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call Slides
Seeking Alpha (Thu, Jul 27)


A hidden driver could send gold soaring
CNBC (Thu, Jul 27)


PRECIOUS-Gold hits six-week peak on weak dollar, short-covering
CNBC (Thu, Jul 27)


Dynacor Gold: Signs Of A Turnaround?
Seeking Alpha (Thu, Jul 27)


Gold Prices Supported By The Dead Cat Dollar
Seeking Alpha (Wed, Jul 26)


BRIEF-New Gold reports Q2 earnings per share $0.04
Reuters (Wed, Jul 26)






Related Companies
No Related Companies available.























1-855-586-6843call
9am-6pm ET, Monday - Friday
service@motifinvesting.com
P.O. Box 3548, Rancho Cordova, CA 95741





What We Offer
Impact Portfolio
Trading Account
IPOs





Why Motif





Who We Are
About Us
Leadership
Press
Careers




Resources
Explore Motifs
Blog
FAQ
Pricing




Other Sites
Motif Advisor
Motif Capital







Motif Capital Management, Inc., is an SEC-registered investment adviser and a separate, wholly-owned subsidiary of Motif Investing, Inc., a registered broker-dealer and member SIPC.
Member: FINRA | SIPC

Terms of Use
Business Continuity
Business Rule 606
Privacy Policy
Sitemap

© 2017 Motif Investing, Inc. All rights reserved. Build ID production.281




The Exchange Traded Funds prospectus contains its investment objectives, risks, charges, expenses and other important information you should read and consider carefully prior to making an investment decision.
        Please review the current prospectus, available from the Prospectus link on www.motifinvesting.com, by phone at 1-855-586-6843, or in writing at Motif Investing, Inc., P.O. Box 3548, Rancho Cordova, CA  95741.
ETFs have unique features that you should be aware of, which can include distribution of any gains, risks related to securities within the portfolio, and tax consequences. The data quoted herein represents past performance and is not indicative of future results. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate so that your investment, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original value. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data provided.  Please review the prospectus or other research tools provided on this site for more recent information. Contact Motif Investing at 1-855-586-6843 to obtain the most recent month-end performance data.
The 30-Day SEC Yield reflects the dividends and interest earned during the past 30 days after the deduction of the ETF’s expenses.  The 30-day SEC Yield is an annual percentage rate based on the ETF's share price and is calculated by dividing the net investment income per share for the 30 days ended on the date of calculation by that day’s maximum share price.  The Distribution Yield is the trailing 12-Month End Yield derived by adding the trailing 12-month's income distributions and dividing the total by the last month's ending share price. Income refers to interest payments from fixed-income ETFs and dividend payments from stock-based ETFs.
The ETF prospectus is provided by DFS (http://www.rrdonnelley.com/financial-services/). The use of this prospectus is restricted solely to the website of Motif Investing and may not be redistributed, copied or otherwise made available without the express written consent of DFS. Donnelley Financial, LLC. d/b/a EDGAR Online and the information providers herein make no claims concerning the validity of the information provided hereby and will not be held liable for any use of this information. The information provided herein may be displayed and printed for your internal use only and may not reproduced, retransmitted, distributed, disseminated, sold, published, broadcast or circulated to anyone without the express written consent of Donnelley Financial, LLC. d/b/a EDGAR Online.


Fixed income investments are subject to various unique risks, including changes in credit quality, market valuations, liquidity, prepayments, early redemption,
    corporate events, tax ramifications, and other factors. Fixed income securities are subject to increased loss of principal during periods of rising interest rates.


The 1-Year Return/Return Since Inception indicates the performance of this particular motif over the last 12 months or, if the motif was created within the past 12 months, since the date the motif was created. See how we calculate returns.


The Motif Index level represents the performance of a benchmark motif (a motif in our catalog) over time. It is set at 
1000 on the date of inception of the motif. For example, a Motif Index of 1100 represents a 10% return since inception. Similarly, the change in the Index over a 
specified period represents the period return on the portfolio holding the same share weights as the benchmark motif.
The Motif Index is a measure created and maintained by the firm, which has the discretion to change the holdings that comprise the index and to make alterations to a particular Motif Index.


Popularity shows you how much interest a motif is attracting, compared to other motifs. We base this score on a proprietary formula that uses factors like how many people are viewing the motif, and how much conversation about it is happening in the community, in a range from Low-to-High.
The Volatility measurement for a Motif represents the annualized standard deviation of daily returns on a portfolio holding the same share weights as the Motif, and is measured in a range from Low to High. Since the standard deviation of returns are commonly used as a measure of portfolio risk, a Volatility measurement that is High is indicative of the fact that holding the motif in the past subjected the holder to larger fluctuations or higher risk.
The Valuation metric represents the present valuation of the stocks in the motif relative to the broader equity market. The Valuation metric is calculated as the composite Price-to-Earnings ratio for the stocks in the motif weighted by their respective share weights in a range from Low to High.


Standard pricing: $9.95 total commission per motif transaction. Other fees may apply. For details on fees and commissions, please   
    click here.

        Performance returns indicate the performance of a particular security over that stated period of time as of the date provided. Performance is quoted for informational purposes only, however, there is no guarantee those returns will continue. See how we calculate returns.
    

        Performance returns, including 1-month Return/Return Since Inception/1-year returns indicates the performance of this particular motif over that stated period of time as of the date provided. Performance is quoted for informational purposes only, however, there is no guarantee those returns will continue. See how we calculate returns.
    
System response time and account access times may vary due to a variety of factors, including trading volumes, market conditions, system performance, and other factors.
Time shown in Eastern Time unless otherwise specified.


The data contained herein from third party providers is obtained from what are considered reliable sources. However, it's accuracy, completeness, or reliability cannot be guaranteed. 


Investing in securities involves risks, you should be aware of prior to making an investment decision, including the possible loss of principal. An investment in individual stocks, or a collection of stocks
    focused on a particular theme or idea, such as a motif, may be subject to increased risk of price fluctuation over more diversified holdings due to adverse developments which can affect a particular industry or sector.
    Investments in ETFs can include those with a narrow or targeted investment strategy and can be subject to similar sector risks than more broadly diversified investments.
    Motif makes no representation regarding the suitability of a particular investment or investment strategy.  You are responsible for all investment decisions you make including understanding the risks involved with your
    investment strategy.   


Please refer to your personal Motif Social Network privacy settings to verify they are current according to your personal requirements. You are responsible
     for establishing your privacy settings according to your unique needs and ensuring they remain current, accurate, and based on your individual and self-directed
     instructions. You should refer to the Terms of Use for further information regarding your authorized use of the Motif Social Network, available on the Support
     page.
Any opinions, comments and recommendations in the Motif Investing Network ("Network") are generated by its members and do not represent the opinions, 
    comments or recommendations of Motif or any of its Associates. The content is intended for educational and informational purposes only and it should 
    not be construed as an offer, or a solicitation of an offer, to buy or sell securities, or any other product or service provided by Motif. Motif is not
    responsible for and does not guarantee the accuracy, currency, completeness or usefulness of information, commentary, recommendations, advice, investment
    ideas or other materials generated within Motif's Network by customers and users participating with Social Groups. The content within the Motif Network is
    not personalized or tailored in any way to a user or customer's financial circumstances, investment objectives, risk tolerance or time horizon and the
    securities and investment strategies discussed may not be suitable for participants. Any performance data displayed has not been verified and is not an
    indication of future results. All investments are subject to risk. Content presented in the Motif Network is subject to edit or removal without notice.


While certain companies may have consistently paid dividends in the past, there can be no assurance or guarantee that they will be able to continue paying dividends in the future.


International investments involve additional risks you should be aware of, which include differences in financial accounting standards,
    currency fluctuations, political instability, foreign taxes and regulations, news that can trigger volatile conditions, and the potential 
    for illiquid markets. Small cap companies in these markets may react with greater volatility in reaction to activities in those markets.





















World Currency Gold Trust files with the SEC-SPDR(R) Long Dollar Gold Trust





World Currency Gold Trust files with the SEC-SPDR(R) Long Dollar Gold Trust-continued




November 10, 2016--World Currency Gold Trust has filed a Amendment No. 4 to Form S-1 registration statement with the SEC-SPDR(R) Long Dollar Gold Trust.
view filing

Source: SEC.gov




American ETP News


Exchange Traded Concepts files with the SEC- REX Gold Hedged S&P 500 ETF





July 28, 2017--Exchange Traded Concepts has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the REX Gold Hedged S&P 500 ETF.
read more


Exchange Traded Concepts files with the SEC-REX VolMAXXTM 





July 28, 2017--Exchange Traded Concepts has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the REX VolMAXXTM LONG VIX WEEKLY FUTURES STRATEGY ETF
REX VolMAXXTM SHORT VIX WEEKLY FUTURES STRATEGY ETF.

read more


First Trust files with the SEC-First Trust Dow 30 Equal Weight ETF





July 28, 2017--First Trust has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the First Trust Dow 30 Equal Weight ETF.

read more


Canadian Securities Regulators Publish Final Amendments to Custody and Other Requirements for Dealers, Advisers and Investment Fund Managers





July 27, 2017--The Canadian Securities Administrators (CSA) today published final amendments to National Instrument 31-103 Registration Requirements, Exemptions and Ongoing Registrant Obligations (NI 31-103) and National Instrument 33-109 Registration Information.
read more


WisdomTree files with the SEC-WisdomTree CBOE Russell 2000 PutWrite Strategy Fund





July 27, 2017--WisdomTree has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the WisdomTree CBOE Russell 2000 PutWrite Strategy Fund.
read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC-AAM S&P ETFs





July 27, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the AAM S&P 500 Sector High Dividend ETF
AAM S&P Emerging Markets Sector High Dividend ETF.
read more


Validea Capital Management files with the SEC





July 27, 2018--Validea Capital Management has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


IMF-Ten Ways to Expand U.S. Growth





July 27, 2017--With the economy at full employment, the United States will need to gradually remove both fiscal and monetary support, while intensifying efforts to address multiple constraints on its medium-term growth prospects, the IMF says in its latest economic report. 
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares Core S&P 500 ETF





July 27, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares Core S&P 500 ETF.
read more


OECD-Argentina: Further reforms are needed to boost sustainable and inclusive growth





July 27, 2017--Argentina is making progress in its path to advance its growth agenda. The first OECD Multi-dimensional Economic Survey of Argentina underlines the achievements to date of the government's recent and comprehensive programme of macroeconomic and structural reforms.
read more


Canadian securities regulators publish guidance on conflict of interest transactions





July 27, 2017--The securities regulatory authorities in Ontario, Qu&?eacute;bec, Alberta, Manitoba and New Brunswick (the participating jurisdictions) today published CSA Multilateral Staff Notice 61-302 Staff Review and Commentary on Multilateral Instrument 61-101 Protection of Minority Security Holders in Special Transactions.
read more


Federal Reserve issues FOMC statement





July 26, 2017--Information received since the Federal Open Market Committee met in June indicates that the labor market has continued to strengthen and that economic activity has been rising moderately so far this year.
read more


Betterment Adds More Human Advice to Its Robo Services 





July 26, 2017--Automated-investing firm streamlines offering, cuts some pricesA company founded on the idea of managing money for individuals based on algorithms is adding more advice from humans.

read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC-AlphaMark Actively Managed Small Cap ETF





July 26, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the AlphaMark Actively Managed Small Cap ETF.
read more


WisdomTree Model Portfolios Now Available Through Envestnet Wealth Management Platform





July 25, 2017--WisdomTree Investments, Inc. (NASDAQ:WETF), an exchange-traded fund ("ETF") and exchange-traded product ("ETP") sponsor and asset manager driven by research and technology, today announced WisdomTree's model portfolios will now be available on the Envestnet Wealth Management platform.
read more


Horizons Nasdaq 100 Covered Call ETF (QYLD) Crosses $100 Million Threshold





July 25, 2017--Horizons (US) flagship buy-write fund delivered high-quality strategy and income at low cost.Horizons ETFs Management (US) LLC ("Horizons US"), announced that its flagship fund, the Horizons Nasdaq 100 Covered Call ETF (ticker: QYLD) ("the fund"), surpassed $100 million in assets.
read more


The Nasdaq Stock Market(R) Welcomes 14 New ETPs in the Second Quarter of 2017





July 25, 2017--Nasdaq (Nasdaq:NDAQ), the single largest U.S. equity exchange by market share, announced 14 new exchange-traded product (ETP) listings from five issuers during the second quarter of 2017.
read more


Latest Outlook for The Americas: Back on Cruise Control, But Stuck in Low Gear





July 25, 2017--After disappointing growth over the past few years, economic activity in Latin America remains on track to recover gradually in 2017-18 as recessions in a few countries-notably Argentina and Brazil-are coming to an end. Our latest projections show the region growing by 1 percent in 2017 and 1.9 percent in 2018.
read more


ROBO GLOBAL(R) Q2 2017 ROBOTICS QUARTERLY REVIEW





July 25, 2017--RECORD BREAKING YEAR FOR ROBO

The equity market has been resilient in the face of the realization that perhaps no fiscal stimulus is forthcoming this year.
read more


ProShares Launches First U.S. Equity ETF Specifically Designed to Outperform in a Rising Rate Environment





July 25, 2017--ProShares, a premier provider of ETFs, announced today the launch of ProShares Equities for Rising Rates ETF (EQRR), the first U.S. equity ETF specifically designed to outperform traditional large-cap indexes, such as the S&P 500,in a rising interest rate environment.
read more


Transamerica files with the SEC-DeltaShares ETFs





July 25, 2017--Transamerica has filed a pre-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for theDeltaShares S&P 500 Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P 400 Managed Risk ETF 
DeltaShares S&P 600 Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P International Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P Emerging Plus & Managed Risk ETF.

read more


SEC Issues Investigative Report Concluding DAO Tokens, a Digital Asset, Were Securities





July 25, 2017--U.S. Securities Laws May Apply to Offers, Sales, and Trading of Interests in Virtual Organizations
The Securities and Exchange Commission issued an investigative report today cautioning market participants that offers and sales of digital assets by "virtual" organizations are subject to the requirements of the federal securities laws.
read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC-AlphaClone ETFs





July 25, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the AlphaClone Alternative Alpha ETF)
AlphaClone International ETF
AlphaClone Small Cap ETF
AlphaClone Activist Manager ETF
AlphaClone Value Manager ETF.

read more


XTF ETF Fund Stats Top 5 ETFs Funds weeke ending July 21, 2017





July 25, 2017--The XTF ETF Fund Stats for the top 5 ETFs ending the week of July 21, 2017 is now available for viewing.
read more


Natixis and Nasdaq announce exclusive licensing partnership





July 24, 2017--New Index aims to reduce market capitalization biases. NASDAQ-100 Target 25 Excess Return Index will be used as an underlying index for structured solutions.
read more


iSHares(R) files with the SEC-iShares(R) Commodity Optimized Trust





July 24, 2017--iShares(R) has filed a Form S-1 registration statement with the SEC for the iShares® Commodity Optimized Trust (formerly known as the iShares Dow Jones-UBS Roll Select Commodity Index Trust).
read more


NYSE American Opens to Take on Upstart Exchange IEX





July 24, 2017--Overhauls smallest market with speed bump it once questioned
IEX opened a year ago after battle with rivals including NYSE
read more


AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Markets Continue To Melt (higher!)





July 24, 2017--Highlights of the Prior Week Ending 7/21/2017
Macro

The Bank of Japan (the central bank) left rates on hold at -0.1% and also revised its timetable for achieving 2% inflation to 2020.
read more


First Trust files with the SEC-First Trust Dow 30 Equal Weight ETF





July 24, 2017--First Trust has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the First Trust Dow 30 Equal Weight ETF.

read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC-Reverse Cap Weighted U.S. Large Cap ETF





July 24, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective mendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Reverse Cap Weighted U.S. Large Cap ETF.
read more


Northern Lights Fund Trust IV files with the SEC-FormulaFolios ETFs





July 21, 2017--Northern Lights Fund Trust IV has filed a pre-effective amendment, registration statement with the SECFormulaFolios Tactical Growth ETF
FormulaFolios Smart Growth ETF.
read more


Motley Fool Asset Management files with the SEC





July 21, 2017--Motley Fool Asset Management has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


EntrepreneurShares files with the SEC





July 21, 2017--EntrepreneurShares has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


Deutsche Bank Markets Research-North America-United States-Synthetic Equity & Index Strategy-ETF+ Quarterly Directory





July 21, 2017--Data as of June 30th, 2017
This document includes all US listed exchange-traded funds (ETFs) and exchange-
traded vehicles (ETVs), plus a special section covering exchange-traded (ETNs).
The directory is organized by asset class and asset-class-related sub sections.
read more


Power struggle at Guggenheim Partners rattles a Wall Street star





July 21, 2017--Battle between CEO and investment chief has alarmed clients and sparked departures.
read more


SEC slated to finalize new transparency rules next spring





July 21, 2017--The US Securities and Exchange Commission is tentatively planning to finalize rules next spring aimed at increasing transparency for alternative trading systems and modernizing disclosure requirements by registered investment companies.
read more


ETF Managers Group Announces Closures Of 2 ETFs





July 21, 2017--ETF Managers Group LLC ("ETFMG") today announced that the Board of Trustees of the ETF Managers Trust has decided to close the PureFunds ISE Big Data ETF (BIGD) and the PureFunds Solactive FinTech ETF (FINQ) based on an ongoing review of market demand.
read more


Oppenheimer files with the SEC-Oppenheimer Revenue Weighted ETF Trust





July 20, 2017--Oppenheimer has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for theOppenheimer [ ] Low Volatility Factor ETF
Oppenheimer [ ] Momentum Factor ETF  
Oppenheimer [ ] Quality Factor ETF
Oppenheimer [ ] Size Factor ETF   
Oppenheimer [ ] Value Factor ETF
Oppenheimer [ ] Yield Factor ETF.

read more


Principal Financial Group files with the SEC





July 20, 2017--Principal Financial Group has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the
Principal Contrarian Value Index ETFPrincipal Emerging Markets Multi-Factor Index ETF
Principal International Multi-Factor Index ETF Principal Sustainable Momentum Index ETFPrincipal U.S. Mega-Cap Multi-Factor Index ETF.
read more


Calvert Management Series files with the SEC-Calvert Ultra-Short Income NextShares





July 20, 2017--Calvert has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Calvert Ultra-Short Income NextShares.
read more


SL Advisors LLC  files with the SEC





July 20, 2017--SL Advisors LLC has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC. 
read more


Thomson Reuters and S-Network Introduce ESG Best Practices Ratings & Indices





July 20, 2017--Rebranding and methodology changes to existing indices reflect market evolution and growth of ESG investing strategies
read more


Toronto Stock Exchange Reaches Record Number of ETFs





July 20, 2017--Market open ceremony to celebrate significant milestone

Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX) today announced that it has reached a significant milestone with 500 exchange traded funds (ETFs) listed.
read more


Exchange Listed Funds files with the SEC-ProSports Sponsors ETF





July 20, 2017--Exchange Listed Funds has filed a post-effective amendment No. 46 with the SEC for the ProSports Sponsors ETF.
read more


USCF  Launches The United States 3X Oil Fund and The United States 3X Short  Oil Fund





July 20, 2017--Today, USCF launched the United States 3X Oil Fund (USOU) and the United States 3X Short Oil Fund (USOD). 
read more


DB Markets Research-North America Synthetic Equity & Index Strategy-US ETF Compass-ETPs entered uncharted territory with $245bn inflows in H1





July 20, 2017--June turned a positive, but mixed month for risky assets
Global Equities were up by 0.80% during last month, mainly driven by US and
EM equities with returns of 0.95% and 0.93%, respectively; meanwhile, DM Intl
equities were also positive, but less significant (+0.3%). Fixed Income was mixed with rates pointing to a flattening of the curve, and credit spreads tightening.
read more


Global X files with the SEC-Global X Iconic U.S. Brands ETF.





July 19, 2017--Global X has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Global X Iconic U.S. Brands ETF.
read more


Morningstar Reports U.S. Mutual Fund and ETF Asset Flows for June 2017





July 19, 2017--Morningstar, Inc. (NASDAQ: MORN), a leading provider of independent investment research, today reported estimated U.S. mutual fund and exchange-traded fund (ETF) asset flows for June 2017.
read more


The U.S. Falls in a Global Retirement Security Ranking





July 19, 2017--With sharp income inequality and too few workers to support its waves of retirees, America is demoted to No. 17. 
read more


Canada is now getting its own cyber security and gender diversity ETFs





July 19, 2017--The roster of exchange-traded funds in Canada, already tallying more than 500, keeps growing.

read more


CFTC.gov Commitments of Traders Reports Update





July 21, 2017--The current reports for the week of July 18, 2017 are now available.
read more


NYSE ARCA ETF Report-Second Quarter 2017





July 18, 2017--The NYSE ARCA ETF Report is now available. View ETF Market Statistics, Regulatory Updates, Indexing Trends and more
read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC





July 18, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Change Finance Diversified Impact U.S. Large Cap Fossil Fuel Free ETF.
read more


J.P. Morgan files with the SEC





July 18, 2017--J.P. Morgan has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for theJPMorgan Equity Long/Short ETF   
JPMorgan Managed Futures ETF.

read more


CBOE Vest Financial, LLC files with the SEC





July 18, 2017--CBOE Vest Financial, LLC has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


ProShares files with the SEC-ProShares Equities for Rising Rates ETF





July 18, 2017--ProShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the ProShares Equities for Rising Rates ETF.
read more


AdvisorShares files 2 filings with the SEC- AdvisorShares New Tech and Media ETF





July 18, 2017---AdvisorShares has filed 2  post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the  AdvisorShares New Tech and Media ETF.
read more


First Asset ETFs Complete Conversion of Advisor Class Units to Common Class Units





July 18, 2017--Further to its announcements on April 3, 2017 and May 1, 2017, First Asset Investment Management Inc. ("First Asset"), the manager of the First Asset Exchange Traded Funds ("ETFs"), announces that it has completed the conversion of all advisor class units to the corresponding common class units of the same ETF at the close of business on Friday, July 14, 2017 (the "Conversion Date").  
read more


China Increases U.S. Treasury Holdings for Fourth Straight Month





July 18, 2017--Chinese holdings grow as reserves rise, yuan stabilizes
Japan also boosts ownership and remains biggest holder

read more


Treasury International Capital Data For May





May 18, 2017--The U.S. Department of the Treasury today released Treasury International Capital (TIC) data for May 2017
read more


WisdomTree files with the SEC-WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund





July 17, 2017--WisdomTree has filed a posy-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund.
read more


GraniteShares files with the SEC-GraniteShares Gold Trust 





July 17, 2017--GraniteShares has filed a Form S-1 Registration statement with the SEC for the GraniteShares Gold Trust.
read more


USCF Funds files with the SEC-United States 3x Short Oil Fund





July 17, 2017--USCF Funds Trust has filed a Pre-Effective Amendment No. 4 to Form S-1 registration statement with the SEC for the United States 3x Short Oil Fund.
read more


USCF Funds files with the SEC- United States 3x Oil Fund





July 17, 2017--USCF Funds Trust has filed a Pre-Effective Amendment No. 4 to Form S-1 registration statement with the SEC for the United States 3x Oil Fund.
read more


BlackRock attracts $104bn in new client money in second quarter





July 17, 2017--Growing demand for its exchange traded funds helped BlackRock pull in $104bn of new client money in the second quarter, taking the pool of cash run by the world's largest asset manager to a total of $5.68tn.

read more


AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Is A Minsky-esque Moment Coming?





July 17, 2017--Highlights of the week Ending 7/14/2017

Macro
  
If anything is worrying the stock market, you couldn't tell by looking at the indexes which marched higher to new highs (for the Dow and S&P) with the Dow Jones gaining 1.06%, the S&P 500 added 1.40%, the NASDAQ up 2.56% and the Russell 2000 tacked on 86 basis points.
read more


Northern Trust Announces Leadership Changes





July 17, 2017--Northern Trust Corporation (Nasdaq: NTRS) announced today that Stephen N. Potter, President of Northern Trust Asset Management, will be appointed as Vice Chairman with responsibilities including oversight of key strategic initiatives and the development of select clients and prospects around the globe.
read more


Fears of Price Distortion Raised Over U.S. Treasuries Market





July 16, 2017--The U.S. Treasuries market is at risk of price distortions that could put investors in bonds and derivatives in danger of big losses, research has revealed.

read more


USCF ETF Trust files with the SEC-United States 3x Short Oil Fund





July 14, 2017--USCF has filed a pre-effective amendment no. 3 to Form S-1 registration statement with the SEC for the United States 3x Short Oil Fund.
read more


Charles Schwab files with the SEC-Schwab 1000 Index(R) ETF





July 14, 2017--Charles Schwab has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Schwab 1000 Index(R) ETF.
read more


Horizons ETFs files with the SEC-Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF





July 14, 2017--Horizons ETF has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF.
read more


ETF Series Solutions files with the SEC





July 14, 2017--ETF Series Solutions has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Reverse Cap Weighted U.S. Large Cap ETF.
read more


PowerShares files with the SEC-PowerShares S&P 500 Minimum Variance Portfolio





July 14, 2017--PowerShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEc for the PowerShares S&P 500 Minimum Variance Portfolio.
read more


PowerShares files with the SEC-PowerShares Russell 1000 Enhanced Equal Weight Portfolio





July 14, 2017--PowerShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the PowerShares Russell 1000 Enhanced Equal Weight Portfolio.
read more


Northern Lights Fund Trust IV files with the SEC-





July 14, 2017--Northern Lights Fund Trust IV has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC. This filing relates solely to Main Sector Rotation ETF.
read more


Pimco's recovery from Gross exit continues as managed assets hit $1.6tn





July 13, 2017--Pimco said on Thursday that its assets under management climbed 6.6 per cent in the second quarter, highlighting the US fund manager's recovery from co-founder Bill Gross's departure three years ago.

read more


IMF Country report-Canada: Selected Issues and Analytical Notes





July 13, 2017--INFRASTRUCTURE BANK: LEVERAGING PRIVATE
CAPITAL IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST1
A. Introduction
1. Investment in infrastructure is a growing component of national economic growth strategies worldwide. While often used as a short-term stimulus to increase demand in an
economy, infrastructure is also effective in the long-term by raising labor productivity growth and
supporting export performance.
read more


Bats Welcomes Two New PowerShares Funds to the Bats ETF Marketplace





July 13, 2017--Bats, a CBOE Holdings, Inc. company, and a leading market for exchange-traded product (ETP) trading globally, today welcomed two new PowerShares funds to the Bats ETF Marketplace.
read more


BlackRock Expands iShares Fixed Income ETF Offerings





July 13, 2017--Establishing the iShares MBS ETF (MBB) as an Investor Vehicle of Choice in $5.5 Trillion Mortgage-Backed Bond Market

read more


Bats Welcomes New Issuer Oppenheimer Funds to the Bats ETF Marketplace





July 13, 2017--Bats, a CBOE Holdings, Inc. company, and a leading market for exchange-traded product (ETP) trading globally, today welcomed new issuer OppenheimerFunds to the Bats ETF Marketplace, with the listing of three revenue-weighted funds.
read more


Vanguard CEO Bill McNabb to Step Down





July 13, 2017--Money manager says investment chief Tim Buckley will take over in January.
read more


Bats Welcomes Two New iShares Funds to the Bats ETF Marketplace





July 13, 2017--Bats, a CBOE Holdings,Inc. company, and  a leading  market for exchange-traded  product (ETP) trading globally, today  welcomed two new iShares funds
to the Bats ETF Marketplace
read more


IMF Country Reports-Brazil: Selected Issues





July 13, 2017--INVESTMENT IN BRAZIL: FROM CRISIS TO RECOVERY1
While Brazil's deep recession has been broad based, it has been marked by a particularly large fall in investment. Real investment fell by around 30 percent between the beginning
of 2014 and the beginning of 2017.
read more


EURO STOXX 50 Licensed To U.S. Based Direxion





July 12, 2017--STOXX Ltd., the operator of Deutsche Boerse Group's index business and a global provider of innovative and tradable index concepts, today announced that the EURO STOXX 50 has been licensed to Direxion Funds to underlie a 3x Leveraged ETF.
read more


Canada's rate rise is latest shift in global central bank policy





July 12, 2017--Rate rise boosts the Canadian currency as central bank positions for inflation uptick.
read more


Semiannual Monetary Policy Report to the Congress





July 12, 2017--Chairman Hensarling, Ranking Member Waters, and other members of the Committee, I am pleased to present the Federal Reserve's semiannual Monetary Policy Report to the Congress. 
read more


Yellen Says Economy Is Robust, but Adds That Fed Will Stay Flexible





July 12, 2017-- Janet L. Yellen, the Federal Reserve chairwoman, delivered an upbeat message on the state of the American economy to Congress on Wednesday, highlighting the strength of job growth and indicating that the Fed remained on course to begin reducing its bond holdings in the fall.
read more


Investing Legend Burton Malkiel Joins the Toroso ETF Industry Index Committee





July 12, 2017--Author of "A Random Walk Down Wall Street" brings wealth of experience to the team overseeing the only benchmark for the fast-growing ETF industry
read more


ETFis files with the SEC-Virtus InfraCap U.S. Preferred Stock ETF





July 12, 2017--ETFis has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Virtus InfraCap U.S. Preferred Stock ETF.
read more


Columbia ETF Trust files with the SEC-Columbia Diversified Fixed Income Allocation ETF





July 12, 2017--Columbia ETF Trust has filed a pre-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Columbia Diversified Fixed Income Allocation ETF.
read more


IndexIQ Lowers Fees For Its Suite Of 50 Percent Currency Hedged International Equity ETFs 





July 12, 2017--HFXI expense ratio lowered by almost half; HFXE & HFXJ lowered by more than a third 
read more


NuShares files with the SEC-NuShares ESG U.S. Aggregate Bond ETF  





July 12, 2017--NuShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the NuShares ESG U.S. Aggregate Bond ETF.
 
read more


CBOE Vest Financial, LLC files with the SEC





July 12, 2017--CBOE Vest Financial, LLC has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


Change Finance files with the SEC





July 12, 2017--Change Finance has filed a amended application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


Legg Mason files with the SEC-Legg Mason Small-Cap Quality Value ETF





July 12, 2017--Legg Mason has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC. This filing relates solely to Legg Mason Small-Cap Quality Value ETF
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares ESG USD Corporate Bond ETF





July 12, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares ESG USD Corporate Bond ETF.
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares ESG 1-5 Year USD Corporate Bond ETF 





July 12, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares ESG 1-5 Year USD Corporate Bond ETF. 
read more


Horizons ETFs Management (US) LLC Announces Successful Reorganization of Horizons S&P 500(R) Covered Call ETF





July 11, 2017--Today, Horizons ETFs Management (US) LLC (the "Firm") announced that the Horizons S&P 500(R) Covered Call ETF (the "Fund") has officially been reorganized as a series of the Horizons ETF Trust I.
read more


Solactive adds some grey hair to the management team 





July 11, 2017--Entering a new chapter of growth  with  new key hires and the 
establishment of the first overseas office


read more


CME Group Announces First Trades After the Return of the Russell 2000 Index Suite of Products





July 11, 2017--CME Group, the world's leading and most diverse derivatives marketplace, today announced the successful launch of futures and options based on the Russell 2000(R)Index.
read more


IMF Working paper-A License to Issue (Anywhere): Patterns and Drivers of Corporate Bonds in Latin America





July 11, 2017--Summary:

This paper overviews patterns in bond issuance in local and external markets by firms in six large Latin American countries. 
read more


Minutes of the Board's discount rate meetings from June 5 and June 14, 2017





July 11, 2017--The Federal Reserve Board on Tuesday released the minutes of its interest rate meetings from June 5 and June 14, 2017.
read more


 AdvisorShares Delivers High-Growth FANG Exposure with New Active ETF





July 11, 2017--The launch of the AdvisorShares New Tech and Media ETF (Ticker: FNG) provides a concentrated exposure to leading disruptive innovators
read more


SportsETFs, LLC Launches ProSports Sponsors ETF 





July 11, 2017--SportsETFs, LLC today launched the ProSports Sponsors ETF (BATS: FANZ), its first exchange-traded fund. 
read more


OSC Publishes Summary Report for Dealers, Advisers and Investment Fund Managers





July 11, 2017--The Ontario Securities Commission (OSC) today published OSC Staff Notice 33-748 Annual Summary Report for Dealers, Advisers and Investment Fund Managers.
read more


Horizons ETF files with the SEC-Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF





July 10, 2017--Horizons has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Horizons S&P 500 Covered Call ETF.
read more


CBO-Monthly Budget Review for June 2017





July 10, 2017--The federal budget deficit was $520 billion for the first nine months of fiscal year 2017, the Congressional Budget Office estimates-$120 billion more than the shortfall recorded during the same span last year. 
read more


NYSE Revamp Steps Up Threat to Speed-Fighting IEX Exchange





July 10, 2017--IEX Group Inc., which has struggled to gain market share with its U.S. stock market, is facing another challenge as the New York Stock Exchange opens a copycat market
read more


AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Do Investors Want More Correlation?





July 10, 2017--AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Week Ending 7/7/2017
Macro

Domestic equities started the second half on a positive note even if not an enthusiastic note as the Dow Jones Industrial Average added 0.28%, the S&P 500 tacked on six basis points, the NASDAQ moved ahead 0.18% and the Russell 2000 gained 0.07%.
read more


Canadian ETF Association elects Kevin Gopaul as board chair





July 10, 2017--The Canadian ETF Association (CETFA) has appointed Kevin Gopaul, head of BMO Global Asset Management Canada, head of quantitative strategies and ETFs, and chief investment officer (Canada), as chair of CETFA's board of directors.
read more


Schwab ETF OneSourceTM Expands Offering of Commission-Free ETFs





July 10, 2017-Charles Schwab announced today that Schwab ETF OneSourceTM, the program that offers the most commission-free1 Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) anywhere in the industry, has added 15 ETFs to its roster.
read more


 Deutsche Asset Management Continues to Add ETFs to Schwab ETF OneSourceTM





July 10, 2017--HYLB, DEMG and JPN are now available to Charles Schwab clients

Deutsche Asset Management (Deutsche AM) today announced that it will offer its award-winning fixed income exchange-traded fund (ETF)-Deutsche X-trackers USD High Yield Corporate Bond ETF-along with two additional international funds on Schwab ETF OneSourceTM
read more


CICC to acquire majority stake in KraneShares





July 10, 2017--China International Capital Corporation Limited (CICC), one of China's leading investment banking and financial services firms, announced today the signing of a definitive agreement to acquire a majority stake in Krane Funds Advisors, LLC, ("KraneShares") a U.S. asset management firm best known for its China focused KraneShares exchange traded funds (ETFs) and innovative China investment strategies.
read more


Transamerica files with the SEC-DeltaShares ETFs





July 10, 2017--Transamerica has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for theDeltaShares S&P 500 Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P 400 Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P 600 Managed Risk ETF
DeltaShares S&P International Managed Risk ETF

DeltaShares S&P Emerging Plus Managed Risk ETF.

read more


ProShares files with the SEC-





July 7, 2017--ProShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the
Long Online Short Bricks & Mortar Retail ETFUltraShort Bricks and Mortar Retail 
UltraPro Short Bricks and Mortar Retail.
read more


USAA ETF files with the SEC





July 7, 2017--USAA ETF has filed a registration statement with the SEC for theUSAA MSCI USA Value Momentum Blend Index ETFUSAA MSCI USA Small Cap Value Momentum Blend Index ETF
USAA MSCI International Value Momentum Blend Index ETF
USAA MSCI Emerging Markets Value Momentum Blend Index ETF.
read more


USCF Advisers files with the SEC





July 7, 2017--USCF Advisers has filed a fifth amended and restated application for exemptive relief with the SEC-actively managed ETFs.
read more


Northern Lights Fund Trust IV files with the SEC-Main Sector Rotation ETF





July 7, 2017--Northern Lights Fund Trust IV has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Main Sector Rotation ETF, a actively managed ETF.
read more


Exchange Listed Funds files with the SEC-ProSports Sponsors ETF





July 7, 2017--Exchange Listed Funds has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the ProSports Sponsors ETF.
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares Edge Investment Grade Enhanced Bond ETF 





July 7, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares Edge Investment Grade Enhanced Bond ETF.
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares Edge High Yield Defensive Bond ETF 





July 7, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares Edge High Yield Defensive Bond ETF.
read more


Bats Welcomes 43rd iShares ETF to Bats ETF Marketplace





July 7, 2017-Bats, a CBOE Holdings, Inc. company, and a leading market for exchange-traded products (ETP) trading globally, today welcomes a new iShares ETF to the Bats ETF Marketplace.
read more


ULTUMUS-Global ETF Monitor-Evangelical Christian ETFs, Principal Spectrum and Legg Mason 





July 7, 2017--Americas
Evangelical Christian ETFs are few in number, but Inspire has just added one more. The newly launched Inspire Corporate Bond Impact ETF (IBD) will invest in the bonds of S&P 500 companies -but only those deemed worthy.
read more


Goldman Sachs files with the SEC-Goldman Sachs Access High Yield Corporate Bond ETF





July 6, 2017--Goldman Sachs has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Goldman Sachs Access High Yield Corporate Bond ETF.
read more


Principal files with the SEC-Principal Spectrum Preferred Securities Active ETF





July 6, 2017-Principal has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Principal Spectrum Preferred Securities Active ETF.
read more


Former Bain Manager Launches $50 Million Bitcoin and Ethereum Fund





July 6, 2017--Some of the wealthiest families in Latin America now have access to a new way to invest, thanks in part to a former senior manager at consulting firm Bain & Company.
read more


ULTUMUS-Global ETF Monitor-July 6, 2017--





July 6, 2017--America:

American issuer Exchange Traded Concepts, has listed the ProSports Sponsors ETF (FANZ) in New York. 
read more


First Asset U.S. TrendLeaders Index ETF





July 5, 2017--First Asset Investment Management Inc. ("First Asset") is pleased to announce that First Asset U.S. TrendLeaders Index ETF (the "ETF") has closed the initial offering of its units and the units will commence trading today on the Toronto Stock Exchange ("TSX") under the ticker symbol SID.
read more


America's Top Bond Manager Never Falls in Love





July 5, 2017--Pimco's Kiesel keeps a sharp eye on debt metrics and doesn't get carried away. 
read more


Minutes of the Federal Open Market Committee, June 13-14, 2017





July 5, 2017--The Federal Reserve Board and the Federal Open Market Committee on Wednesday released the attached minutes of the Committee meeting held on June 13-14, 2017.
read more


The Nasdaq glitch explained





July 4, 2017--Amazon, Microsoft and Apple among equities converging at $123.47 after data error
read more


J.P. Morgan files with the SEC-JPMorgan Disciplined High Yield ETF





July 3, 2017--JP Morgan has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the JPMorgan Disciplined High Yield ETF.
read more


AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Jawboning Works





July 3, 2017--AdvisorShares Weekly Market Review-Highlights of the Week Ending 6/30/2017Macro

For weeks, months even, there was a meaningful flattening trend in the US Treasury market which was at odds with the FOMC's long stated intention to hike its rates three times in 2017 with two under its belt already.
read more


The Forum at ETF Research Center-July 2017 Sector SPDR Analyzer





July 3, 2017--Notable This Month:

The recent pullback in certain "FANG" stocks notwithstanding, the Tech rally in 1H17 has pushed valuations well above their range of the past few years.
read more


Data glitch: Google, Yahoo finance sites display incorrect stock market prices





July 3, 2017--Incorrect market data appeared on sites such as Google Finance, Yahoo Finance and Bloomberg terminals in early Asia hours on Tuesday.
read more


TrimTabs launches international free cash flow ETF





June 30, 2017--New York-based investment manager TrimTabs Asset Management has launched the TrimTabs All Cap International Free-Cash-Flow ETF (Bats: TTAI), an actively managed fund investing in non-US developed market stocks that are both generating free cash flow, reducing their share count without the use of leverage, and maintaining healthy balance sheets.
read more


American Century Investment Management files with the SEC





June 30, 2017--American Century Investment Management has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


American Century Investment Management files with the SEC





June 30, 2017--American Century Investment Management has filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


Northern Lights Fund Trust IV files with the SEC





June 30, 2017--Northern Lights Fund Trust IV and Sage Advisory Services LTD Co. have filed a application for exemptive relief with the SEC.
read more


Krane Shares files with the SEC-KraneShares Bosera MSCI China A Share ETF





June 30, 2017--KraneShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEc for the KraneShares Bosera MSCI China A Share ETF.
read more


Legg Mason files with the SEC-Legg Mason Small-Cap Quality Value ETF





June 30, 2017--Legg Mason has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Legg Mason Small-Cap Quality Value ETF.
read more


First Trust files with the SEC





June 30, 2017--First Trust has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC.
This Registration Statement relates to the  Developed International
Equity Select ETF, Emerging Markets Equity Select ETF, Large Cap US Equity
Select ETF, Mid Cap US Equity Select ETF, Small Cap US Equity Select ETF and US
Equity Dividend Select ETF.
read more


First Trust files with the SEC





June 30, 2017--First Trust has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC.This Registration Statement relates to the Developed International Equity Select ETF, Emerging Markets Equity Select ETF, Large Cap US Equity Select ETF, Mid Cap US Equity Select ETF, Small Cap US Equity Select ETF and US Equity Dividend Select ETF.
read more


iShares files with the SEC-iShares MSCI Emerging Markets ex China ETF





June 30, 2017--iShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the iShares MSCI Emerging Markets ex China ETF.
read more


PowerShares files with the SEC-PowerShares S&P 500 Minimum Variance Portfolio





June 30, 2017--PowerShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the PowerShares S&P 500 Minimum Variance Portfolio.
read more


PowerShares files with the SEC-PowerShares Russell 1000 Enhanced Equal Weight Portfolio





June 30, 2017--PowerShares has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the PowerShares Russell 1000 Enhanced Equal Weight Portfolio.
read more


Renaissance Capital US IPO Market 2Q 2017 Quarterly Review-Most Active IPO Market in Two Years





June 30, 2017--The US IPO market's 2017 recovery gained momentum in the second quarter, with 52 IPOs raising $11 billion, a two-year high in terms of deal count and proceeds. Just halfway through the year, the 2017 IPO market has raised more capital than all of 2016.
read more


State Street Global Advisors to Close 19 ETFs





June 30, 2017--State Street Global Advisors, the asset management arm of State Street (STT) announced that it was planning to close and liquidate 19 exchange-traded funds after the market's close on Friday.
read more


BlackRock Announces Index Changes on Three iShares ETFs





June 30, 2017--Effective on or around September 1, 2017, BlackRock will make index changes to three iShares ETFs.
read more


BlackRock moves 50 ETFs to NYSE's rival exchanges





June 30, 2017--BlackRock Inc (BLK.N) on Friday said it would move fifty of its exchange-traded funds from NYSE Arca to homes on rival trading exchanges in a move that points to more competition in the fast-growing industry.
read more


CFTC.gov Commitments of Traders Reports Update





June 30, 2017--The current reports for the week of June 27, 2017 are now available.
read more


Guggenheim Investments changes name of actively managed USD1bn enhanced short duration ETF





June 30, 2017--Name change to Guggenheim Ultra Short Duration ETF (GSY) better reflects investment strategy that seeks to offer enhanced yield opportunities combined with lower sensitivity to interest rate fluctuations.
read more


Pimco files with the SEC





June 29, 2017--Pimco has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC.
read more


WisdomTree Launches New Smart Beta Fund with Multifactor Exposure: WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund





June 29, 2017--WisdomTree (NASDAQ:WETF), an exchange-traded fund ("ETF") and exchange-traded product ("ETP") sponsor and asset manager, today announced the launch of the WisdomTree U.S. Multifactor Fund (USMF), on the BATS Exchange.
read more


Cambria files with the SEC-Cambria Sovereign Bond ETF





June 29, 2017--Cambria has filed a post-effective amendment, registration statement with the SEC for the Cambria Sovereign Bond ETF.

read more






June 29, 2017--The Canadian Securities Administrators (CSA) today published for comment proposed amendments to National Instrument 45-102 Resale of Securities (NI 45-102) that would introduce a new prospectus exemption for the resale of securities of a foreign issuer.
read more


CBO-An Update to the Budget and Economic Outlook: 2017 to 2027





June 29, 2017--Under current law, deficits in CBO's baseline projections continue to climb over the next decade, driving up federal debt. Economic growth remains modest, at about 2.0 percent through 2018 and then 1.9 percent later in the period. 

read more






Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











iShares Gold Trust | IAU

























 



 
 


WHO WE ARE
BlackRock is trusted to manage more money than any other investment manager in the world, helping millions of people and the world’s biggest institutions and governments reach their investing goals.
Source: BlackRock. Based on $4.89 trillion in AUM as of 6/30/16





 BLACKROCK

BLACKROCK

 


 Mutual Funds

Mutual Funds

 

 iShares ETFs

iShares ETFs

 

 Closed-End Funds

Closed-End Funds

 

 Insights

Insights

 

 Advisor Center

Advisor Center

 

 Retirement

Retirement

 

 Investing Blog

Investing Blog

 




 iSHARES

iSHARES

 


 Find an ETF

Find an ETF

 

 About ETFs

About ETFs

 

 Why ETFs

Why ETFs

 




 OUR FIRM

OUR FIRM

 


 About Us

About Us

 

 Newsroom

Newsroom

 

 Investor Relations

Investor Relations

 

 Public Policy

Public Policy

 

 Responsibility

Responsibility

 

 Careers

Careers

 

 Contact Us

Contact Us

 




 INSTITUTIONS

INSTITUTIONS

 


 Investment Ideas

Investment Ideas

 

 Insights

Insights

 

 Our Clients

Our Clients

 




 BLACKROCK SOLUTIONS

BLACKROCK SOLUTIONS

 


 Aladdin

Aladdin

 

 Financial Markets Advisory

Financial Markets Advisory

 

 Engineering Blog

Engineering Blog

 





FOLLOW US 


 
 

 
 

 
 

 
 

 
 












 Our Company and Sites








 United States

 



Select Country 



  United States


 United States
 



 Other iShares Sites
 



 




Sign In 
 

















 
 

Find a Fund



Investment Ideas 



Education 



Client Resources 
















ASSET CLASS
 Equity

Equity

 Fixed Income

Fixed Income

 Commodity

Commodity

 Real Estate

Real Estate

 



REGION
 United States

United States

 Global

Global

 Europe

Europe

 Asia Pacific

Asia Pacific

 



MARKET
 Emerging

Emerging

 Developed

Developed

 




Popular Strategies
 Core

Core

 Currency Hedged

Currency Hedged

 Smart Beta

Smart Beta

 Equity Income

Equity Income

 Interest Rate Hedged

Interest Rate Hedged

 




 Sectors

Sectors

 Country

Country

 Minimum Volatility

Minimum Volatility

 Sustainable

Sustainable

 




 > View all products

> View all products

 






FEATURED PRODUCT
 

 
iShares Core S&P 500 ETF












Build Your CoreExplore Smart Beta 




Navigate InternationalFind Income 






FEATURED STRATEGY

Explore Smart Beta











Index Investing
What is index investing? 



Exchange Traded Funds
What is an ETF?Why Use ETFs?How to Buy ETFsGo Deeper on ETF Mechanics 






FEATURED CONTENT

How to Buy ETFs











Investment Professionals
Institutional InvestorsAdvisors, RIAs, & Private Banks 



Other Resources
InsightsToolsTax CenterFinancial, Tax and Legal Documents2016 Capital Gains DistributionsResource Library 






GET ACCESS

Sign in to iShares.com  
















































 
 
























Select country 


Select country 

























Filter list by keyword
Show All
Show Fewer
to
of
Total
Sorry, no data available.






IAU



iShares Gold Trust





Fact Sheet


Prospectus


Periodic SEC Reports


Gold Bar List


Download

 









Commodity




Fact Sheet


Prospectus


Periodic SEC Reports


Gold Bar List


Download

 





IAU



iShares Gold Trust





How To Buy










NAV as of 28-Jul-2017


$12.16





52 WK: 10.84 - 13.14




1 Day NAV Change as of 28-Jul-2017



0.03
(0.25%)






NAV Total Return as of 28-Jul-2017

YTD: 


8.96%


YTD (year to date) is a period, starting from the beginning of the current calendar year, and continuing up to the present day.







Fees as stated in the prospectus

Sponsor's Fee
0.25% 













Overview






Why IAU?
1. Exposure to the day-to-day movement of the price of gold bullion
 
2. Convenient, cost-effective access to physical gold
 
3. Use to diversify your portfolio and help protect against inflation
 


INVESTMENT OBJECTIVE
The iShares Gold Trust (the 'Trust') seeks to reflect generally the performance of the price of gold.

The iShares Gold Trust is not a standard ETF. The Trust is not an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 or a commodity pool for purposes of the Commodity Exchange Act. Shares of the Trust are not subject to the same regulatory requirements as mutual funds. Before making an investment decision, you should carefully consider the risk factors and other information included in the prospectus.




Next:
Previous:









Performance

 Performance




Returns








Average Annual


Cumulative


Calendar Year







as of 

30-Jun-2017 

31-May-2017 

30-Apr-2017 

31-Mar-2017 

28-Feb-2017 

31-Jan-2017 

31-Dec-2016 

30-Nov-2016 

31-Oct-2016 

30-Sep-2016 

31-Aug-2016 

31-Jul-2016 

30-Jun-2016 

31-May-2016 

30-Apr-2016 

31-Mar-2016 

29-Feb-2016 

31-Jan-2016 

31-Dec-2015 

30-Nov-2015 

31-Oct-2015 

30-Sep-2015 

31-Aug-2015 

31-Jul-2015 

30-Jun-2015 

31-May-2015 

30-Apr-2015 

31-Mar-2015 

28-Feb-2015 

31-Jan-2015 

31-Dec-2014 

30-Nov-2014 

31-Oct-2014 

30-Sep-2014 

31-Aug-2014 

31-Jul-2014 

30-Jun-2014 

31-May-2014 

30-Apr-2014 

31-Mar-2014 

28-Feb-2014 

31-Jan-2014 

31-Dec-2013 

30-Nov-2013 

31-Oct-2013 

30-Sep-2013 

31-Aug-2013 

31-Jul-2013 

30-Jun-2013 

31-May-2013 

30-Apr-2013 

31-Mar-2013 

28-Feb-2013 

31-Jan-2013 

31-Dec-2012 

30-Nov-2012 

31-Oct-2012 

30-Sep-2012 

31-Aug-2012 

31-Jul-2012 

30-Jun-2012 

31-May-2012 

30-Apr-2012 

31-Mar-2012 

29-Feb-2012 

31-Jan-2012 

31-Dec-2011 

30-Nov-2011 

31-Oct-2011 

30-Sep-2011 

31-Aug-2011 

31-Jul-2011 

30-Jun-2011 

31-May-2011 

30-Apr-2011 

31-Mar-2011 

28-Feb-2011 

31-Jan-2011 

31-Dec-2010 

30-Nov-2010 

31-Oct-2010 

30-Sep-2010 

31-Aug-2010 

31-Jul-2010 

30-Jun-2010 

31-May-2010 

30-Apr-2010 

31-Mar-2010 

28-Feb-2010 

31-Jan-2010 

31-Dec-2009 

30-Nov-2009 

31-Oct-2009 

30-Sep-2009 

31-Aug-2009 

31-Jul-2009 

30-Jun-2009 

31-May-2009 

30-Apr-2009 

31-Mar-2009 

28-Feb-2009 

31-Jan-2009 

31-Dec-2008 

30-Nov-2008 

31-Oct-2008 

30-Sep-2008 

31-Aug-2008 

31-Jul-2008 

30-Jun-2008 

31-May-2008 

30-Apr-2008 

31-Mar-2008 

29-Feb-2008 

31-Jan-2008 

31-Dec-2007 

30-Nov-2007 

31-Oct-2007 

30-Sep-2007 

31-Aug-2007 

31-Jul-2007 

30-Jun-2007 

31-May-2007 

30-Apr-2007 

31-Mar-2007 

28-Feb-2007 

31-Jan-2007 

31-Dec-2006 

30-Nov-2006 

31-Oct-2006 

30-Sep-2006 

31-Aug-2006 

31-Jul-2006 

30-Jun-2006 

31-May-2006 

30-Apr-2006 

31-Mar-2006 

28-Feb-2006 

31-Jan-2006 

31-Dec-2005 

30-Nov-2005 

31-Oct-2005 

30-Sep-2005 

31-Aug-2005 

31-Jul-2005 

30-Jun-2005 

31-May-2005 

30-Apr-2005 

31-Mar-2005 

28-Feb-2005 

31-Jan-2005 









 

1y 

3y 

5y 

10y 

Incept. 





Total Return (%) 
Total return represents changes to the NAV and accounts for distributions from the fund.



-6.13


-2.11


-5.15


6.41


8.63




Market Price (%) 
Market price return represents changes to the midpoint price and accounts for distributions from the fund. The midpoint is the average of the bid-ask prices at 4:00 PM ET (when NAV is normally determined for most funds).



-6.65


-2.55


-5.19


6.36


8.61




Reference Benchmark 
On March 20, 2015, the iShares Gold Trust began referencing a new performance benchmark, the LBMA Gold Price. From December 9, 2010 to March 19, 2015 benchmark performance reflects the London Gold Fix benchmark. Prior to December 9, 2010, benchmark performance was based on the Gold Futures Spot Month Settlement Price as reported by the COMEX division of the CME Group and disseminated through Bloomberg (“spot price”).



-5.94


-1.88


-4.92


6.72


8.97






Missing average annual returns data 







as of 

30-Jun-2017 

31-May-2017 

30-Apr-2017 

31-Mar-2017 

28-Feb-2017 

31-Jan-2017 

31-Dec-2016 

30-Nov-2016 

31-Oct-2016 

30-Sep-2016 

31-Aug-2016 

31-Jul-2016 

30-Jun-2016 

31-May-2016 

30-Apr-2016 

31-Mar-2016 

29-Feb-2016 

31-Jan-2016 

31-Dec-2015 

30-Nov-2015 

31-Oct-2015 

30-Sep-2015 

31-Aug-2015 

31-Jul-2015 

30-Jun-2015 

31-May-2015 

30-Apr-2015 

31-Mar-2015 

28-Feb-2015 

31-Jan-2015 

31-Dec-2014 

30-Nov-2014 

31-Oct-2014 

30-Sep-2014 

31-Aug-2014 

31-Jul-2014 

30-Jun-2014 

31-May-2014 

30-Apr-2014 

31-Mar-2014 

28-Feb-2014 

31-Jan-2014 

31-Dec-2013 

30-Nov-2013 

31-Oct-2013 

30-Sep-2013 

31-Aug-2013 

31-Jul-2013 

30-Jun-2013 

31-May-2013 

30-Apr-2013 

31-Mar-2013 

28-Feb-2013 

31-Jan-2013 

31-Dec-2012 

30-Nov-2012 

31-Oct-2012 

30-Sep-2012 

31-Aug-2012 

31-Jul-2012 

30-Jun-2012 

31-May-2012 

30-Apr-2012 

31-Mar-2012 

29-Feb-2012 

31-Jan-2012 

31-Dec-2011 

30-Nov-2011 

31-Oct-2011 

30-Sep-2011 

31-Aug-2011 

31-Jul-2011 

30-Jun-2011 

31-May-2011 

30-Apr-2011 

31-Mar-2011 

28-Feb-2011 

31-Jan-2011 

31-Dec-2010 

30-Nov-2010 

31-Oct-2010 

30-Sep-2010 

31-Aug-2010 

31-Jul-2010 

30-Jun-2010 

31-May-2010 

30-Apr-2010 

31-Mar-2010 

28-Feb-2010 

31-Jan-2010 

31-Dec-2009 

30-Nov-2009 

31-Oct-2009 

30-Sep-2009 

31-Aug-2009 

31-Jul-2009 

30-Jun-2009 

31-May-2009 

30-Apr-2009 

31-Mar-2009 

28-Feb-2009 

31-Jan-2009 

31-Dec-2008 

30-Nov-2008 

31-Oct-2008 

30-Sep-2008 

31-Aug-2008 

31-Jul-2008 

30-Jun-2008 

31-May-2008 

30-Apr-2008 

31-Mar-2008 

29-Feb-2008 

31-Jan-2008 

31-Dec-2007 

30-Nov-2007 

31-Oct-2007 

30-Sep-2007 

31-Aug-2007 

31-Jul-2007 

30-Jun-2007 

31-May-2007 

30-Apr-2007 

31-Mar-2007 

28-Feb-2007 

31-Jan-2007 

31-Dec-2006 

30-Nov-2006 

31-Oct-2006 

30-Sep-2006 

31-Aug-2006 

31-Jul-2006 

30-Jun-2006 

31-May-2006 

30-Apr-2006 

31-Mar-2006 

28-Feb-2006 

31-Jan-2006 

31-Dec-2005 

30-Nov-2005 

31-Oct-2005 

30-Sep-2005 

31-Aug-2005 

31-Jul-2005 

30-Jun-2005 

31-May-2005 

30-Apr-2005 

31-Mar-2005 

28-Feb-2005 

31-Jan-2005 









 
YTD
1m
3m
6m
1y
3y
5y
10y
Incept.





Total Return (%) 
Total return represents changes to the NAV and accounts for distributions from the fund.



7.08


-1.89


-0.25


7.08


-6.13


-6.20


-23.25


86.17


180.06




Market Price (%) 
Market price return represents changes to the midpoint price and accounts for distributions from the fund. The midpoint is the average of the bid-ask prices at 4:00 PM ET (when NAV is normally determined for most funds).



7.77


-2.29


-0.58


7.77


-6.65


-7.45


-23.38


85.25


179.39




Reference Benchmark 
On March 20, 2015, the iShares Gold Trust began referencing a new performance benchmark, the LBMA Gold Price. From December 9, 2010 to March 19, 2015 benchmark performance reflects the London Gold Fix benchmark. Prior to December 9, 2010, benchmark performance was based on the Gold Futures Spot Month Settlement Price as reported by the COMEX division of the CME Group and disseminated through Bloomberg (“spot price”).



7.17


-1.89


-0.21


7.17


-5.94


-5.53


-22.29


91.68


191.13






Missing cumulative returns data 







as of 

30-Jun-2017 

31-May-2017 

30-Apr-2017 

31-Mar-2017 

28-Feb-2017 

31-Jan-2017 

31-Dec-2016 

30-Nov-2016 

31-Oct-2016 

30-Sep-2016 

31-Aug-2016 

31-Jul-2016 

30-Jun-2016 

31-May-2016 

30-Apr-2016 

31-Mar-2016 

29-Feb-2016 

31-Jan-2016 

31-Dec-2015 

30-Nov-2015 

31-Oct-2015 

30-Sep-2015 

31-Aug-2015 

31-Jul-2015 

30-Jun-2015 

31-May-2015 

30-Apr-2015 

31-Mar-2015 

28-Feb-2015 

31-Jan-2015 

31-Dec-2014 

30-Nov-2014 

31-Oct-2014 

30-Sep-2014 

31-Aug-2014 

31-Jul-2014 

30-Jun-2014 

31-May-2014 

30-Apr-2014 

31-Mar-2014 

28-Feb-2014 

31-Jan-2014 

31-Dec-2013 

30-Nov-2013 

31-Oct-2013 

30-Sep-2013 

31-Aug-2013 

31-Jul-2013 

30-Jun-2013 

31-May-2013 

30-Apr-2013 

31-Mar-2013 

28-Feb-2013 

31-Jan-2013 

31-Dec-2012 

30-Nov-2012 

31-Oct-2012 

30-Sep-2012 

31-Aug-2012 

31-Jul-2012 

30-Jun-2012 

31-May-2012 

30-Apr-2012 

31-Mar-2012 

29-Feb-2012 

31-Jan-2012 

31-Dec-2011 

30-Nov-2011 

31-Oct-2011 

30-Sep-2011 

31-Aug-2011 

31-Jul-2011 

30-Jun-2011 

31-May-2011 

30-Apr-2011 

31-Mar-2011 

28-Feb-2011 

31-Jan-2011 

31-Dec-2010 

30-Nov-2010 

31-Oct-2010 

30-Sep-2010 

31-Aug-2010 

31-Jul-2010 

30-Jun-2010 

31-May-2010 

30-Apr-2010 

31-Mar-2010 

28-Feb-2010 

31-Jan-2010 

31-Dec-2009 

30-Nov-2009 

31-Oct-2009 

30-Sep-2009 

31-Aug-2009 

31-Jul-2009 

30-Jun-2009 

31-May-2009 

30-Apr-2009 

31-Mar-2009 

28-Feb-2009 

31-Jan-2009 

31-Dec-2008 

30-Nov-2008 

31-Oct-2008 

30-Sep-2008 

31-Aug-2008 

31-Jul-2008 

30-Jun-2008 

31-May-2008 

30-Apr-2008 

31-Mar-2008 

29-Feb-2008 

31-Jan-2008 

31-Dec-2007 

30-Nov-2007 

31-Oct-2007 

30-Sep-2007 

31-Aug-2007 

31-Jul-2007 

30-Jun-2007 

31-May-2007 

30-Apr-2007 

31-Mar-2007 

28-Feb-2007 

31-Jan-2007 

31-Dec-2006 

30-Nov-2006 

31-Oct-2006 

30-Sep-2006 

31-Aug-2006 

31-Jul-2006 

30-Jun-2006 

31-May-2006 

30-Apr-2006 

31-Mar-2006 

28-Feb-2006 

31-Jan-2006 

31-Dec-2005 

30-Nov-2005 

31-Oct-2005 

30-Sep-2005 

31-Aug-2005 

31-Jul-2005 

30-Jun-2005 

31-May-2005 

30-Apr-2005 

31-Mar-2005 

28-Feb-2005 

31-Jan-2005 









 
 2012

 2013

 2014

 2015

 2016






Total Return (%) 
Total return represents changes to the NAV and accounts for distributions from the fund.


8.37
-27.94
-0.43
-11.71
8.88



Market Price (%) 
Market price return represents changes to the midpoint price and accounts for distributions from the fund. The midpoint is the average of the bid-ask prices at 4:00 PM ET (when NAV is normally determined for most funds).


6.76
-28.21
-1.97
-10.66
8.21



Reference Benchmark 
On March 20, 2015, the iShares Gold Trust began referencing a new performance benchmark, the LBMA Gold Price. From December 9, 2010 to March 19, 2015 benchmark performance reflects the London Gold Fix benchmark. Prior to December 9, 2010, benchmark performance was based on the Gold Futures Spot Month Settlement Price as reported by the COMEX division of the CME Group and disseminated through Bloomberg (“spot price”).


8.69
-27.79
-0.19
-11.42
9.12





Missing calendar year returns data 






The performance quoted represents past performance and does not guarantee future results. Investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate so that an investor’s shares, when sold or redeemed, may be worth more or less than the original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance quoted.






Growth of Hypothetical $10,000 The growth of hypothetical $10,000 chart reflects a hypothetical $10,000 investment and assumes reinvestment of dividends and capital gains. Fund expenses, including management fees and other expenses were deducted.





Performance chart data not available for display.




View full chart





Performance chart data not available for display.


The performance quoted represents past performance and does not guarantee future results. Investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate so that an investor’s shares, when sold or redeemed, may be worth more or less than the original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance quoted, and numbers may reflect small variances due to rounding. Standardized performance and performance data current to the most recent month end may be found in the Performance section.





Premium/Discount 


View full chart




















Key Facts

 
Key Facts



Net Assets

as of 28-Jul-2017



$8,574,117,083




Ounces in Trust

as of 28-Jul-2017



6,779,764.20




Inception Date




21-Jan-2005




Exchange




NYSE Arca




Asset Class




Commodity




Bloomberg Index Ticker




GOLDLNPM




Tonnes in Trust
One metric tonne is equivalent to 1,000 kilograms or 32,150.7465 troy ounces.

as of 28-Jul-2017



210.87




Indicative Basket Amount

as of 28-Jul-2017



480.734




Basket Amount

as of 28-Jul-2017



480.744




Shares Outstanding

as of 28-Jul-2017



705,000,000




Premium/Discount
The amount the Fund is trading above or below the reported NAV expressed as a percentage of the NAV. When the fund&#39;s market price is greater than the fund’s NAV, it is said to be trading at a &quot;Premium&quot; and the percentage is expressed as a positive number. When the fund&#39;s market price is less than the fund’s NAV, it is said to be trading at a &quot;Discount&quot; and the percentage is expressed as a negative number. 

as of 28-Jul-2017



0.41%




CUSIP




464285105




Closing Price
The Closing Price is the price of the last reported trade on the fund’s primary exchange (see “Exchange” above).

as of 28-Jul-2017



12.21




Mid-Point Price
The midpoint between the highest bid and the lowest offer on the listing exchange, as of the time that the Fund&#39;s NAV is calculated (usually 4:00 pm eastern time for most funds).

as of 28-Jul-2017



12.21




Options Available




Yes




20 Day Avg. Volume
Average Daily Volume (ADV) on primary exchange (see “Exchange” above); may differ from ADV reported by other sources, which may publish an aggregated ADV from all exchanges on which the ETF trades.

as of 28-Jul-2017



1,821,893




Daily Volume
The number of shares or contracts traded in a security or an entire market during a given period of time. It is simply the amount of shares that trade hands from sellers to buyers as a measure of activity. If a buyer of a stock purchases 100 shares from a seller, then the volume for that period increases by 100 shares based on that transaction. Volume shown is the volume that traded on the primary exchange (see “Exchange” above) as of the date indicated.

as of 28-Jul-2017



1,679,743




Gold Spot Price
Source: TheBullionDesk.com. Time stamp is GMT (Greenwich Mean Time). Gold Spot Prices provided by The Bullion Desk. No warranty is given for the accuracy of these prices and no liability is accepted for reliance thereon. Prices are provided on a reasonable efforts basis and delays may occur both because of the delay in third parties communicating the information to the site and because of delays inherent in posting information over the internet. Prices shown are indicative only and do not represent actionable quotations on prices of actual trades.














Portfolio Characteristics 

 
Portfolio Characteristics 



Equity Beta
Beta is a measure of the tendency of securities to move with the market as a whole. A beta of 1 indicates that the security&#39;s price will move with the market. A beta less than 1 indicates the security tends to be less volatile than the market, while a beta greater than 1 indicates the security is more volatile than the market.<br/><br/>Calculated vs. S&amp;P 500

as of 30-Jun-2017



0.38




Standard Deviation (3y)
Standard deviation measures how dispersed returns are around the average. A higher standard deviation indicates that returns are spread out over a larger range of values and thus, more volatile.

as of 30-Jun-2017



14.46%





This information must be preceded or accompanied by a current prospectus. For standardized performance, please see the Performance section above.














































Literature

 
Literature
 













How to Buy iShares ETFs





How to Buy iShares ETFs



There are many ways to access iShares ETFs. Learn how you can add them to your portfolio.



Learn More
Learn More








Discuss with your financial planner today

Share this fund with your financial planner to find out how it can fit in your portfolio.

Email your advisor



Buy through your brokerage

iShares funds are available through online brokerage firms.
70 iShares ETFs trade commission-free online through Fidelity.

Visit Fidelity



Carefully consider the Funds' investment objectives, risk factors, and charges and expenses before investing. This and other information can be found in the Funds' prospectuses or, if available, the summary prospectuses, which may be obtained by visiting the iShares ETF and BlackRock Fund prospectus pages. Read the prospectus carefully before investing. Investing involves risk, including possible loss of principal.

Before engaging Fidelity or any broker-dealer, you should evaluate the overall fees and charges of the firm as well as the services provided. Fidelity and BlackRock have entered into a long-term marketing program that compensates Fidelity to promote iShares ETFs; as part of this agreement, Fidelity offers 70 iShares ETFs commission-free online for qualified buyers and sellers. Additional information about this arrangement, including any compensation, is contained in the ETF’s registration statement. ETFs are subject to a short–term trading fee by Fidelity, if held less than 30 days. Other conditions and fees may apply. See Fidelity.com/commissions for details. BlackRock is not affiliated with Fidelity or any of their affiliates.

The Funds are distributed by BlackRock Investments, LLC (together with its affiliates, “BlackRock”).

©2016 BlackRock, Inc. All rights reserved. BLACKROCK, BLACKROCK SOLUTIONS, BUILD ON BLACKROCK, ALADDIN, iSHARES, iBONDS, iTHINKING, iSHARES CONNECT, FUND FRENZY, LIFEPATH, SO WHAT DO I DO WITH MY MONEY, INVESTING FOR A NEW WORLD, BUILT FOR THESE TIMES, the iShares Core Graphic, CoRI and the CoRI logo are registered and unregistered trademarks of BlackRock, Inc., or its subsidiaries in the United States and elsewhere. All other marks are the property of their respective owners.

USR-9694
















 


 

 

 

 

 





Investment Ideas 

Build Your Core
Explore Smart Beta
Navigate International
Find Income




Education 

What is index investing?
What is an ETF?
Why Use ETFs?
How to Buy ETFs
Go Deeper on ETF Mechanics




Client Resources 

Institutional Investors
Advisors, RIAs, & Private Banks
Insights
Tools
Tax Center
Financial, Tax and Legal Documents
2016 Capital Gains Distributions
Resource Library


















Contact iShares


Terms & Conditions


Privacy Policy


Business Continuity


FINRA BrokerCheck






© 2017 BlackRock, Inc. All rights reserved.






Important Information

 

This information must be preceded or accompanied by a current prospectus. Investors should read it carefully before investing.


iShares Gold Trust (the "Trust") has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus and other documents the Trust has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting www.iShares.com or EDGAR on the SEC website at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the Trust will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling toll-free 1-800-474-2737

Investing involves risk, including possible loss of principal. Because shares of the Trust are intended to reflect the price of the gold held by the Trust, the market price of the shares is subject to fluctuations similar to those affecting gold prices. Additionally, shares of the Trust are bought and sold at market price, not at net asset value ("NAV"). Brokerage commissions will reduce returns.

Shares of the Trust are intended to reflect, at any given time, the market price of gold owned by the Trust at that time less the Trust's expenses and liabilities. The price received upon the sale of the shares, which trade at market price, may be more or less than the value of the gold represented by such shares. If an investor sells the shares at a time when no active market for them exists, such lack of an active market will most likely adversely affect the price received for the shares. For a more complete discussion of the risk factors relative to the Trust, carefully read the prospectus.

Following an investment in shares of the Trust, several factors may have the effect of causing a decline in the prices of gold and a corresponding decline in the price of the shares. Among them: (i) Large sales by the official sector. A significant portion of the aggregate world gold holdings is owned by governments, central banks and related institutions. If one or more of these institutions decides to sell in amounts large enough to cause a decline in world gold prices, the price of the shares will be adversely affected. (ii) A significant increase in gold hedging activity by gold producers. Should there be an increase in the level of hedge activity of gold producing companies, it could cause a decline in world gold prices, adversely affecting the price of the shares. (iii) A significant change in the attitude of speculators and investors towards gold. Should the speculative community take a negative view towards gold, it could cause a decline in world gold prices, negatively impacting the price of the shares.

Gold Spot Prices provided by The Bullion Desk. No warranty is given for the accuracy of these prices and no liability is accepted for reliance thereon. Prices are provided on a reasonable efforts basis and delays may occur both because of the delay in third parties communicating the information to the site and because of delays inherent in posting information over the internet. Prices shown are indicative only and do not represent actionable quotations on prices of actual trades.

The amount of gold represented by shares of the Trust will decrease over the life of the Trust due to sales of gold necessary to pay the sponsor's fee and trust expenses. Without increases in the price of gold sufficient to compensate for that decrease, the price of the shares will also decline, and investors will lose money on their investment. The Trust will have limited duration. The liquidation of the Trust may occur at a time when the disposition of the Trust's gold will result in losses to investors. Although market makers will generally take advantage of differences between the NAV and the trading price of Trust shares through arbitrage opportunities, there is no guarantee that they will do so. There is no guarantee an active trading market will develop for the shares, which may result in losses on your investment at the time of disposition of your shares. The value of the shares of the Trust will be adversely affected if gold owned by the Trust is lost or damaged in circumstances in which the Trust is not in a position to recover the corresponding loss. The Trust is a passive investment vehicle. This means that the value of your shares may be adversely affected by Trust losses that, if the Trust had been actively managed, might have been avoidable.

Shares of the Trust are not deposits or other obligations of or guaranteed by BlackRock, Inc., and its affiliates, and are not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other governmental agency. The sponsor of the trust is iShares Delaware Trust Sponsor LLC (the “Sponsor”). BlackRock Investments, LLC ("BRIL"), assists in the promotion of the Trust. The Sponsor and BRIL are affiliates of BlackRock, Inc. Although shares of the iShares Gold Trust may be bought or sold on the secondary market through any brokerage account, shares of the Trust are not redeemable from the Trust except in large aggregated units called "Baskets". Only registered broker-dealers that become authorized participants by entering into a contract with the sponsor and the trustee of the Trust may purchase or redeem Baskets.

Net Asset Value (NAV) is determined as specified in the prospectus: the Trustee values the trust's gold on the basis of the LBMA Gold Price PM.

All references to LBMA Gold Price are used with the permission of ICE Benchmark Administration Limited and have been provided for informational purposes only. ICE Benchmark Administration Limited accepts no liability or responsibility for the accuracy of the prices or the underlying product to which the prices may be referenced.


Certain sectors and markets perform exceptionally well based on current market conditions and iShares Funds can benefit from that performance. Achieving such exceptional returns involves the risk of volatility and investors should not expect that such results will be repeated.


Options involve risk and are not suitable for all investors. Prior to buying or selling an option, a person must receive a copy of "Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options." Copies of this document may be obtained from your broker, from any exchange on which options are traded or by contacting The Options Clearing Corporation, One North Wacker Dr., Suite 500, Chicago, IL 60606 (1-888-678-4667). The document contains information on options issued by The Options Clearing Corporation. The document discusses exchange traded options issued by The Options Clearing Corporation and is intended for educational purposes. No statement in the document should be construed as a recommendation to buy or sell a security or to provide investment advice. If you need further information, please feel free to call the Options Industry Council Helpline. They will be able to provide you with balanced options education and tools to assist you with your iShares options questions and trading. The Options Industry Council Helpline phone number is 1-888-Options (1-888-678-4667) and its website is www.888options.com.


Although BlackRock shall obtain data from sources that BlackRock considers reliable, all data contained herein is provided “as is” and BlackRock makes no representation or warranty of any kind, either express or implied, with respect to such data, the timeliness thereof, the results to be obtained by the use thereof or any other matter. BlackRock expressly disclaims any and all implied warranties, including without limitation, warranties of originality, accuracy, completeness, timeliness, non-infringement, merchantability and fitness for a particular purpose.
﻿﻿

©2017 BlackRock, Inc. All rights reserved. BLACKROCK, BLACKROCK SOLUTIONS, BUILD ON BLACKROCK, ALADDIN, iSHARES, iBONDS, iSHARES CONNECT, FUND FRENZY, LIFEPATH, SO WHAT DO I DO WITH MY MONEY, INVESTING FOR A NEW WORLD, BUILT FOR THESE TIMES, the iShares Core Graphic, CoRI and the CoRI logo are registered and unregistered trademarks of BlackRock, Inc., or its subsidiaries in the United States and elsewhere. All other marks are the property of their respective owners.


iS-18505





















World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust (ARCA:GLDW) - Fundamentals Analysis


































































Loading...


 
















User Profile
Paid plan pricing

  Nothing to display.





Profile
Support
Learning
About
Logout



Dashboard



Sign up


Login



 









 





















World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust
ARCA:GLDW












Snowflake Description
No noteworthy features. 
The Snowflake is generated from 30 checks in 5 different areas, read more below.









GLDW
ARCA
$0M
Market Cap





 Add to portfolio

Asset Management and Custody Banks
Company description
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust is an exchange traded fund launched and managed by State Street Global Advisors, Inc. More info.

 Add to Portfolio
 Compare
 Print
 Invest
WARNING: This is a fund or ETF! Currently our data availability for these is poor, we only recommend using them as part of a portfolio.
WARNING!World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust is covered by less than 3 analysts.


Hi, it looks like you haven't created a portfolio yet!You can import an existing one from Google Finance or your Broker.

Create Portfolio
×










SHARE PRICE


3 Month History
















Industry





5yr Volatility vs Market





Competitors

Sorry, no analysis for World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's competitors could be found in our database.

















Value
 Is World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust undervalued based on future cash flows and its price relative to the stock market?

Value is all about what a company is worth versus what price it is available for. If you went into a grocery store and all the bananas were on sale at half price, they could be considered undervalued.



INTRINSIC VALUE BASED ON FUTURE CASH FLOWS 

 It is not possible to calculate the future cash flow value for World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust. This is due to cash flow or dividend data being unavailable. The share price is $117.33.



PRICE RELATIVE TO MARKET 


We can also value a company based on what the stock market is willing to pay for it. This is similar to the price of fruit (e.g. Mangoes or Avacados) increasing when they are out of season, or how much your home is worth.
The amount the stock market is willing to pay for World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's earnings, growth and assets is considered below, and whether this is a fair price.




Price based on past earnings

Are World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's earnings available for a low price, and how does this compare to other companies in the same industry?


Information is not available.

Information is not available.




Price based on expected Growth
Does World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's expected growth come at a high price?


No earnings or negative earnings.




Price based on value of assets
What value do investors place on World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's assets?


Information is not available.







X
Value checks
We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's value by looking at:

Is the discounted cash flow value less than 20%, or 40% of the share price? (2 checks) (Click here or on bar chart for details of DCF calculation.)
Is the PE ratio less than the market average, and/ or less than the Financial Institutions industry average (and greater than 0)? (2 checks)
Is the PEG ratio within a reasonable range (0 to 1)? (1 check)
Is the PB ratio less than the Financial Institutions industry average (and greater than 0)? (1 check)
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 0/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: We use GAAP Earnings per Share in all our calculations including PE and PEG Ratio.
Note 2: PEG ratio is based on analysts EPS growth expectations in 1 year (0%).
Full details on the Value part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.





X

Discounted cash flow (Dividend Discount Model)
The calculations below outline how an intrinsic value for World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust is arrived at by discounting future dividends to their present value. This approach is used for finance firms where free cash flow is difficult to estimate (e.g. Banks/ Insurance firms).
If the firm does not pay the majority of its earnings out as a dividend this method will often arrive at a value significantly lower than the share price.
See our documentation to learn about this calculation.

Value of the stock
Value = Expected dividends per share / (Discount Rate - Perpetual growth rate)
$0 = ($0 / (10.55% - 2.33%)
Value per share: $0
Current discount (share price of $117.33): %

Estimate of Discount Rate
The discount rate, or required rate of return, is estimated by calculating the Cost of Equity.
Discount rate = Cost of Equity = Risk Free Rate + (Levered Beta * Equity Risk Premium)
Discount rate = 10.55% = 2.33% + (1.072 * 7.67%)

Estimate of Bottom Up Beta
The Levered is used in the case of financial firms, but it is not adjusted for financial leverage like with non-finance firms. Therefore the average levered beta from comparable firms is used as the bottom-up beta. It is limited to 0.8 to 2.0 (practical range for a stable firm).
Average Levered Beta from peers = 1.072
Levered Beta used in calculation = 1.072

Assumptions

The risk free rate of 2.33% is from the 10 year government bond rate in US.
The bottom-up beta is estimated by analysing other companies in the same industry.
The Equity Risk Premium is calculated by subtracting the risk free rate from the market return premium (10%) (source: Buffet).
The dividend discount model is automatically used for companies in the following industries: Banks, Insurance, Real Estate Investment Trusts (REITs), Diversified Financial Services and Capital Markets.














Future Performance
 How is World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust expected to perform in the next 1 to 3 years based on estimates from 0 analysts?
Future performance analysis is based on estimates from less than 3 analysts.


The future performance of a company is measured in the same way as past performance, by looking at estimated growth and how much profit it is expected to make.Future estimates come from professional analysts. Just like forecasting the weather, they don’t always get it right!

 Insufficient estimate data, unable to calculate 1 year growth expectation.





Past and Future Earnings per Share
The accuracy of the analysts who estimate the future performance data can be gauged below. We look back 3 years and see if they were any good at predicting what actually occured. We also show the highest and lowest estimates looking forward to see if there is a wide range.






Analysts growth expectations



2 year growth check 

x1.5?


Which of the these is expected to increase by over 50% in 2 year's time?

Revenue data unavailable.
Cash flow data unavailable.
Profit data unavailable.






Performance in 3 years 

In the same way as past performance we look at the future estimated return (profit) compared to the available funds. We do this looking forward 3 years.




No 3 year Return on Equity data available.


Improvement & Relative to industry

No 3 year Return on Equity data available.
No 3 year Return on Equity data available.






X
Future performance checks
We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's future performance by looking at:

Is the growth in earnings expected to beat the low risk savings rate, plus a premium to keep pace with inflation, in 1 year and 3 years? (2 checks)
Does the average analyst expect Revenue to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Does the average analyst expect Operating Cash Flow to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Does the average analyst expect Net Income (Profit) to increase by 50% or more in 2 years? (1 check)
Is the Return on Equity in 3 years expected to be over 20%? (1 check)

Some of the above checks will fail if the company is expected to be loss making in the relevant year.
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 0/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: If no +3 year data is available, +2.5 year data may be used.
Note 2: We use GAAP per Share in all our calculations.
Full details on the Future part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Past Performance
 How has World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust performed over the past 5 years?

The past performance of a company can be measured by how much growth it has experienced and how much profit it makes relative to the funds and assets it has available.


Past earnings growth
Below we compare World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's growth in the last year to its industry (Financial Institutions).



Past Earnings growth analysis 
We also check if the company has grown in the past 5 years, and whether it has maintained that growth in the year.
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has been loss making too recently or no data is available.

World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has been trading publicly for less than 3 years.

World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has been trading publicly for less than 3 years.




Profit History
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's revenue and profit over the past 5 years is shown below, any years where they have experienced a loss will show up in red.





Performance last year 

We want to ensure a company is making the most of what it has available. This is done by comparing the return (profit) to a company's available funds, assets and capital.







Negative return on shareholders funds (ROE) last year.
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust had negative or no return on assets (ROA) last year.
Return based on revenue producing assets (ROCE) is negative or zero.





X
Past performance checks
We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's performance over the past 5 years by checking for:

Has earnings per share (EPS) increased in past 5 years? (1 check)
Has the EPS growth in the last year exceeded that of the Financial Institutions industry? (1 check)
Is the current EPS growth higher than the average annual growth over the past 5 years? (1 check)
Is the Return on Equity (ROE) higher than 20%? (1 check)
Is the Return on Assets (ROA) above industry average? (1 check)
Has the Return on Capital Employed (ROCE) increased from 3 years ago? (1 check)

The above checks will fail if the company has reported a loss in the most recent earnings report. Some checks require at least 3 or 5 years worth of data.
World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 0/6, see the detailed checks below.
Note: We use GAAP Earnings per Share in all our calculations.
Full details on the Past part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Health
 How is World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's financial position? (This company is analysed differently as a bank or financial institution)

This company is a bank or financial institution.
Fundamentally a bank's business is based upon borrowing and lending money, for this reason they typically have high levels of debt and we analyse them differently.




Net Worth 








Balance sheet

This treemap shows a more detailed breakdown of World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's finances.
If any of them are yellow this indicates they may be out of proportion and red means they relate to one of the checks below.

Assets



Liabilities and shares


The 'shares' portion represents any funds contributed by the owners (shareholders) and any profits.








Historical Debt 

Nearly all companies have debt. Debt in itself isn’t bad, however if the debt is too high, or the company can’t afford to pay the interest on its debts this may have impacts in the future.
The graphic below shows equity (available funds) and debt, we ideally want to see the red area (debt) decreasing.
If there is any debt we look at the companies capability to repay it, and whether the level has increased over the past 5 years.


 World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has no debt.
BANK ANALYSIS 
This company is a bank or financial institution, which is analysed accordingly below.
Below we check the amount of loans the bank has, how many of those are bad, and its ability to cover any bad loans.

Information is not available.
Information is not available.
Holds no customer deposits, loans are made up entirely of borrowed funds.

High level of bad loan coverage.
Acceptable level of bad loan write offs (less than 2%).





X
Financial health checks (Bank)
We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's financial health as a bank by checking for:

Leverage (Assets to Equity > 20x)? (1 check)
Coverage of bad loans (Bad Loan Coverage > 100%)? (1 check)
Proportion of lower risk deposits compared to total funding (Deposits to Liabilities < 50%)? (1 check)
Proportion of higher risk assets compared to total assets (Loans to Assets > 110%)? (1 check)
Total loans compared to deposit funding (Loans to Deposits > 125%)? (1 check)
Level of bad loans (Net Charge Off Ratio > 3%)? (1 check)
	World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 2/6, see the detailed checks below.
	
Full details on the Health part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.












Dividends
 What is World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's current dividend yield, its reliability and sustainability?

Dividends are regular cash payments to you from the company, similar to a bank paying you interest on a savings account.

	

Annual Dividend Income


0%
Current annual income from World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust dividends. 


If you bought $2,000 of World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust shares you are expected to receive $0 in your first year as a dividend. 


Dividend Amount 

Here we look how much dividend is being paid, if any. Is it above what you can get in a savings account?
 It is up there with the best dividend paying companies?


Paying below low risk savings rate. (2.25%)
Paying below the markets top dividend payers. (3.18%)




Historical dividend yield

It is important to see if the dividend for a company is stable, and not wildly increasing/decreasing each year. This graph shows you the historical rate to count toward your assessment of the stock.We also check to see if the dividend has increased in the past 10 years.



Not paying a notable dividend.
Not paying a notable dividend.




Current Payout to shareholders 

What portion of World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's earnings are paid to the shareholders as a dividend.


Not paying a notable dividend.





Future Payout to shareholders 


Insufficient estimate data to determine if a dividend will be paid in 3 years.





X
Income/ dividend checks
     We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's dividend by checking for:
    
Firstly is the company paying a notable dividend (greater than 0.5%) - if not then the rest of the checks are ignored.
Current dividend yield, is there one at all, is it higher than the low risk savings rate, and is it above the top 25% of dividend payers? (2 checks)
Have they paid a dividend for 10 years, and during this period has the dividend been volatile (drop of more than 25%)? (1 check)
If they have paid a dividend for 10 years has it increased in this time? (1 check)
How sustainable is the dividend, can World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust afford to pay it from its earnings today and in 3 years (Payout ratio less than 90%)? (2 checks)
	World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 0/6, see the detailed checks below.
	
Full details on the Dividends part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.




Management
 What is the CEO of World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's salary, the management and board of directors tenure and is there insider trading?

Management is one of the most important areas of a company. We look at unreasonable CEO compensation, how long the team and board of directors have been around for and insider trading.

Management Team




Board of Directors





Recent Insider Trading 



Who owns this company?





X
Management checks
     We assess World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust's management by checking for:
    
Is the CEO's compensation unreasonable compared to market cap and profit (greater than  0.5% of the company's profit + 0.03% of market cap)? (1 check)
Has the CEO's compensation increased more than 20% whilst the EPS is down more then 20%? (1 check)
Is the average tenure of the management team less than 2 years? (1 check)
Is the average tenure of the board of directors team less than 3 years? (1 check)
	World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust has a total score of 6/6, this is not included on the snowflake, see the detailed checks below.
	
Note: We use the top 6 management executives and board members in our calculations.
	Note 2: Insider trading include any internal stakeholders and  these transactions.
	 Full details on the Management part of the Simply Wall St company analysis model.




Company News







Company Info
Description








		World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust is an exchange traded fund launched and managed by State Street Global Advisors, Inc. The fund invests in commodity and currency markets. It takes long position to invest in physical gold and short positions in a basket of non-U.S. currencies including Euro, Japanese Yen, British Pound Sterling, Canadian Dollar, Swedish Krona and Swiss Franc. It tracks the performance of the Solactive GLD Long USD Gold Index. World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust was formed on January 27, 2017 and is domiciled in the United States.
		

Details

Name:World Currency Gold Trust - SPDR Long Dollar Gold Trust
Ticker:GLDW
Exchange:ARCA
Founded:2017
Market Cap:$0 million
Website:http://www.spdrgoldshares.com/gldw/

Listings




Map




		1209 Orange Street, Wilmington, 19801, United States

		





Street





Industry



Industry:Asset Management and Custody Banks
Sector:Diversified Financials










About
Company
Plans
 
Simply Wall St News
 
Learning Center
Help Center
 
Sitemap
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy







Related Industries


Mortgage Real Estate Investment Trusts (REITs)


Diversified Financial Services


Consumer Finance


Capital Markets







© 2017 Simply Wall Street Pty Ltd, Community Design 2845206, US Design Patent #29/544/281, European Design Registration #2845206, Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC. All rights reserved.
This website contains factual information only (RG244B) and not general or personal advice. It does not take into account your investment objectives, financial situation or needs. You should seek independent financial and legal advice to consider if an investment is appropriate for your personal circumstances.
Copyright © 2017, Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC.  Reproduction of S&P Capital IQ in any form is prohibited except with the prior written permission of S&P.  S&P does not guarantee the accuracy, adequacy, completeness or availability of any information and is not responsible for any errors or omissions, regardless of the cause or for the results obtained from the use of such information.  S&P DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE OR USE.  In no event shall S&P be liable for any direct, indirect, special or consequential damages, costs, expenses, legal fees, or losses (including lost income or lost profit and opportunity costs) in connection with subscriber’s or others’ use of S&P Capital IQ. (2017)




 








ETF / ETP Research - Fidelity












ETF Landing











Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 























Your browser is not supported.

 



Your browser is not supported.

Download the latest version of Internet Explorer







Get ready for an enhanced ETF research experience
The new ETF Research Center makes it easier than ever to analyze and choose the ETFs that are right for you.


Test drive it today








Home >
Research >


			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity –
			Terms of Use
Help/Glossary














ETF / ETP Details

Enter Name or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Performance & Risk
Portfolio Composition
Adv Chart & Technical..
News, Commentary & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Key Statistics
Distributions & Expenses
Ownership
SEC Filings


Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







ETF / ETP Research & Ideas



You are here: ETF /    ETP Research
Screener
Market Tracker
Expert Screening Strategies
Commentary
Explore Research Firms




RELATED RESOURCES

Education
Markets & Sectors
Watch List 















ETF / ETP Research


NEW — Try out the new ETF/ETP screener that's been formatted to fit any device and give you quick access to ETFs that may match what you're looking for.




Find investment and trading ideas. Use screens. Compare Exchange Traded Products (ETPs). Get expert commentary and research. Monitor the market and build your portfolio.



Not a Fidelity Customer?
    No problem! Try our FREE research 









Track the Market  
					

AS OF 4:17 PM ET 07/28/17 | Refresh

Performance
Volume
Net Flows









































Today's Price % Change**Relative Intraday VolumePrior Day as % of Net Assets
-2.5%+2.5%

-60%+60%

-2.0%+2.0%

Get more details on the market






Find Commission-Free ETFs available for purchase online from Fidelity & iShares







Find ETPs


By Name
By Sector/Industry


By Index
By Basket Holdings










Compare or Show Similar ETPs



Compare



Show Similar





Enter up to 5 symbols. Find symbol




Enter one symbol. How are similar funds determined?





Build Your Own Portfolio
 Construct and analyze broad-based or sector-specific ETF portfolios 
Sector Portfolio Builder







Expert Commentary and Ideas
View all Commentary



Daily Commentary


Record Highs & ’SPY’ Pace Weekly Inflows Of $6.5B

BY Sumit Roy
|
ETF.com
|
07/28/2017 |

		0
		
			
			
			VIEW
			
		
		




Why Have Investors Bailed on Low-Volatility Funds?

BY Ben Johnson, CFA
|
Morningstar
|
07/28/2017 |

		8
		
			
			VIEWS
			
			
		
		


Related Symbols:   
      
SPLV
USMV
ITOT




ETF Scorecard: July 28 Edition

BY 
|
ETF Database
|
07/28/2017 |

		69
		
			
			VIEWS
			
			
		
		


Related Symbols:   
      
SPY
RSP
SPHB
QQQ
EEM
IWM
DIA
EFA
XLU

(See All)




Related Symbols:  
SPY
RSP
SPHB
QQQ
EEM
IWM
DIA
EFA
XLU
XLI
XLK
XLE
EWZ
RSX
EPI
FXI
EWJ
EWG
EWU
SLV
USO
DBA
GLD
JJC
UNG
UUP
FXE
FXY
FXB
FXA
CEW
SPLV
XLP
XLF
XLV








View all Daily




Weekly / Bi-Weekly Reviews


3 ways ETFs have revolutionized the bond market

BY Matthew Tucker, CFA  
	                                    | BlackRock
07/26/2017 |

		4
		
			
			VIEWS
			
			
		
		




View all Weekly / Bi-Weekly


Monthly Analysis


Focus ETF Of The Month: ISHARES CORE 1-5 YEAR BOND
		                                    





























































	


BY TODD ROSENBLUTH 
| S&P Capital IQ
07/27/2017 |

		19
		
			
			VIEWS
			
			
		
		


Related Symbols:   
      
ISTB




View all Monthly







  Learn More about ETPs    Explore the world of ETFs     Learn more about the world of exchange-traded funds.     OIC: Enhance ETFs with options strategies      Learn more about ETPs  


Recently Viewed ETFs / ETPs






Learn more about Recently Viewed ETFs/ETPs.




 ETFs appear based on your recent clicks on Fidelity.com. Our     goal is to make it easier for you to research and find the     appropriate ETF for your situation.








Free commission offer applies to online purchases of Fidelity ETFs and select iShares ETFs in a Fidelity brokerage account. Fidelity accounts may require minimum balances. The sale of ETFs is subject to an activity assessment fee (of between $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal). iShares ETFs and Fidelity ETFs are subject to a short-term trading fee by Fidelity if held less than 30 days.*The ETF/ETP Screener includes many types of Exchange-traded funds (ETFs) and Exchange-traded products (ETPs). It can include ETPs not registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940.** Performance data shown is past performance and is no guarantee of future results. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance data quoted. Yield and return will vary, therefore you have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.  For standard quarterly performance, go to the funds SnapShot page by clicking on the ETF/ETPs symbol.ETFs are subject to market fluctuation and the risks of their underlying investments.  ETFs are subject to management fees and other expenses.  Unlike mutual funds, ETF shares are bought and sold at market price, which may be higher or lower than their NAV, and are not individually redeemed from the fund. Leveraged and inverse exchange traded products are not designed for buy and hold Investors or investors who do not intend to manage their investment on a daily basis. These products require a Most Aggressive investment objective and an executed Designated Investments Agreement to purchase. These products are for sophisticated investors who understand their risks (including the effect of daily compounding of leveraged investment results), and who intend to actively monitor and manage their investments on a daily basis.For iShares ETFs, Fidelity receives compensation from the ETF sponsor and/or its affiliates in connection with an exclusive, long-term marketing program that includes promotion of iShares ETFs and inclusion of iShares funds in certain FBS platforms and investment programs. Additional information about the sources, amounts, and terms of compensation is described in the ETFs prospectus and related documents. Fidelity may add or waive commissions on ETFs without prior notice. BlackRock and iShares are registered trademarks of BlackRock, Inc. and its affiliates.News, commentary (including "Related Symbols") and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content.  Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.The Fidelity ETF/ETP Screener (Screener) is a research tool provided to help self-directed investors evaluate exchange traded products (ETPs). Criteria and inputs entered are at the sole discretion of the user, and all screens or strategies with pre-selected criteria (including expert ones) are solely for the convenience of the user. Expert Screens are provided by independent companies not affiliated with Fidelity. Information supplied or obtained from this Screener is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy or approach to screening or evaluating ETPs. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use. Determine which securities are right for you based on your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors and re-evaluate them on a periodic basis.Before investing in any exchange traded product, you should consider its investment objective, risks, charges and expenses. Contact Fidelity for a prospectus, offering circular or, if available, a summary prospectus containing this information. Read it carefully.Fidelity Brokerage Services, LLC, member NYSE, SIPC




© 1998－2017 FMR LLC.
All rights reserved.


Terms of Use
Privacy
Security
Site Map












		ETF/ETP Screens provide quick access to a list of ETFs/ETPs with prospectus-stated objectives focused on geographical location (i.e. region, country); sector (i.e. energy, health care); or asset class (i.e. equity, fixed income). Just click the type of quick screen you want, then choose the area of focus. You can then screen on additional criteria to narrow the results further or begin researching the ETFs/ETPs results already shown by clicking on their symbols. Alternatively, you could click on the link below the map titled "Start Your Own Screen" to screen ETFs/ETPs based on your own criteria, or go to "Saved Screens" to launch a saved screen from a prior session.
		










How are Similar Funds determined?

This function provides a list of ETPs that is generated by XTF Marco Polo ("XTF"), a third-party independent research provider. XTF uses a proprietary algorithm to develop a list monthly of potentially similar ETPs based on a number of financial characteristics. The ETP characteristics evaluated by XTF's algorithm include, but are not limited to, geography, investment philosophy, style, market capitalization, credit grade and return correlations. Please note: The list provided may include as "similar" ETFs, ETNs and other ETP products. ETNs are not mutual funds; they are unsecured debt of the issuer. Unlike ETFs, ETNs are subject to the credit risk of the issuer. ETNs may trade at a price significantly different from their indicative value. ETNs can become illiquid; you should be willing and able to hold your notes until maturity. Some ETNs are callable or redeemable by the issuer before their stated maturity date. The tax treatment of ETNs is uncertain and may vary from what is described in the prospectus. The results may also include inverse and/or leveraged ETFs and ETNs, which require a Most Aggressive investment objective and an executed Designated Investments Agreement to purchase. These products are for sophisticated investors. They are not designed for buy-and-hold investors who seek to track an index over a long period of time.
This function provides general educational information on potentially similar ETPs. While this function may be of use to investors in evaluating certain information about ETPs, it should not be considered to include every factor that may be necessary for an investor to make a decision to invest in an ETP. A decision to invest in a particular ETF may be based on a number of factors, including investors' needs, goals, and comfort with risk. Please read the ETP's prospectus, offering circulate or other publicly available investment information before making an investment decision. As with other investments through Fidelity, you must decide for yourself if an investment in a security is consistent with your evaluation of the security, your investment objectives, your risk tolerance, your investment time frame and your financial situation. The information provided is educational in nature and should not be used as the sole basis for an investment decision. By making this information available, Fidelity is not endorsing or guaranteeing the suitability or potential value of any particular investment or information source.











		ETF/ETP Market Tracker provides a quick snapshot of changes for each asset class and individual ETF/ETPs throughout the trading day*. "Performance" shows change in price; "Volume" displays whether the relative volume is higher or lower than average; and "Net Flows" shows weekly net flows. The size of each box represents the relative change in net assets of the asset class within each category. A larger box indicates a greater change in net assets for the asset class. Click "Get more details on the market" to drill down into distinct and specific areas of the market as well as individual ETF/ETPs.	
These 3 views are updated in the following manner:
Today's Price % Change by Asset Class - Today's intraday price performance percent change for each ETP in each asset class is added together and then divided by the total number of ETPs in each asset class.
Relative Volume by Asset Class - Using the 90-day average of the daily volume for both the market and the security; we divide the security's average volume by the market's total volume to determine the normal percentage of the total volume that comes from each security. Throughout the trading day, we will do a similar calculation, comparing the current volume for that security to the total market volume at that point in the day. The two calculations are compared and if the current day's percentage is greater than the average, the security has higher relative volume than the market.
Prior Day Net Flows as % of Net Assets by Asset Class -  Prior Trading Day's ETP Net Flows are added together for the asset class then divided by the total sum of Net Assets for each asset class.
*Price change and volume are delayed typically 1 to 5 minutes during market open. Market close price change and volume will appear until next market open. 











		Expert Strategies are featured to help educate investors about different investment styles used by research firms and consist of a mix of screens from different providers representing different equity styles and are intended to reflect current market trends. They are typically changed monthly. Fidelity does not endorse or recommend them.
		











		Sabrient selects its ETF Bulls or Bears of the Week using a proprietary methodology that combines Sabrient's Outlook Scores with its Bull or Bear Score.  This results in a ranked universe of approximately 300 ETFs, out of which Sabrient selects three from the highest rankings and three from the lowest for its ETF Bulls/ Bears of the week.   This content is provided for educational purposes only and is updated before the market opens each Monday.
		











		Sabrient selects its ETF Bulls or Bears of the Week using a proprietary methodology that combines Sabrient's Outlook Scores with its Bull or Bear Score.  This results in a ranked universe of approximately 300 ETFs, out of which Sabrient selects three from the highest rankings and three from the lowest for its ETF Bulls/ Bears of the week.   This content is provided for educational purposes only and is updated before the market opens each Monday.
		




















Form  FWP        World Currency Gold Trus               Filed by: World Currency Gold Trust























Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 














Research >
ETFs >


Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity - Terms of Use













ETF / ETP Details

Enter Name or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Performance & Risk
Portfolio Composition
Adv Chart & Technical..
News, Commentary & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Key Statistics
Distributions & Expenses
Ownership
SEC Filings


Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Performance & Risk
Portfolio Composition
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News, Commentary & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Key Statistics
Distributions & Expenses
Ownership
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Research & Ideas
Screener
Market Tracker
Explore Research Firms
Education
Watch List 





















Print



A


A


A





Form  FWP        World Currency Gold Trus               Filed by: World Currency Gold Trust
BY 10K Wizard — 5:18 PM ET 04/26/2017

http://archive.fast-edgar.com/20170426/AG2ZN62DZW2RQZZZ2R2E2ZXOTFK9ZZ22Z892

Filed on: April 26, 2017




More GLDW News



Form  FWP        World Currency Gold Trus               Filed by: World Currency Gold Trust


							EDGAR SEC Filings -	








	
	
		07/13/2017
	


						



Form  424B3      World Currency Gold Trus


							EDGAR SEC Filings -	








	
	
		05/05/2017
	


						



Form  10-Q       World Currency Gold Trus  For: Mar 31


							EDGAR SEC Filings -	








	
	
		05/05/2017
	


						
















© 1998－2017 FMR LLC.
All rights reserved.


Terms of Use
Privacy
Security
Site Map

























GLD: SPDR Gold Shares, Commodity/Real Assets | SSGA SPDRS









UNITED STATES

About SSGA
Contact




Log In / Register



Follow Us :



















Search















Home » ETFs : 
      SPDR® Gold Shares (GLD)
    
SPDR® Gold Shares
    

      GLD





                Fund Overview
            



Fund Overview


Performance


Related Documents








Key Features
The investment objective of SPDR® Gold Trust (the "Trust") is for SPDR® Gold Shares ("GLD") to reflect the performance of the price of gold bullion, less the Trust's expensesThe first US traded gold ETF and the first US-listed ETF backed by a physical assetFor many investors, the costs associated with buying GLD shares in the secondary market and the payment of the Trust's ongoing expenses may be lower than the costs associated with buying, storing and insuring physical gold in a traditional allocated gold bullion account


Important
                          Risk Information »




            Fund Information
            
        
As of 
            07/29/2017
        




                                Ticker Symbol
                            
                        



                                GLD
                            
                        



                                CUSIP
                            
                        



                                78463V107
                            
                        



                                Marginable
                            
                        



                                Yes
                            
                        



                                Options Available
                            
                        



                                Yes
                            
                        



Gross Expense Ratio




The gross expense ratio is the fund's total annual operating expense ratio. It is gross of any fee waivers or expense reimbursements. It can be found in the fund's most recent prospectus.




0.40%




                                Inception Date
                            
                        



                                11/18/2004
                            
                        



                                Trustee
                            
                        



                                BNY Mellon Asset Servicing, a division of The Bank of New York Mellon
                            
                        



                                Marketing Agent
                            
                        



                                State Street Global Advisors Funds Distributors, LLC
                            
                        



                                Custodian
                            
                        



                                HSBC Bank plc
                            
                        



                                Sponsor
                            
                        



                                World Gold Trust Services, LLC
                            
                        



                                Exchange
                            
                        



                                NYSE ARCA EXCHANGE
                            
                        







Fund Documents

Fact SheetPDF

ProspectusPDF




Fund Performance
				    
				

Get a deeper view of how an ETF's allocation to different
                          sectors, countries and market capitalizations may impact its
                          performance.

	Analyze Performance







								        MONTH END 
								        As of
								        06/30/2017


								        QUARTER END 
								        As of 
                                       06/30/2017





1 Month-1.92%-1.92%


QTD-0.31%-0.31%


YTD6.96%6.96%


1 Year-6.32%-6.32%


3 Year-2.27%-2.27%


5 Year-5.30%-5.30%


10 Year6.25%6.25%


Inception
8.10%8.10%




Performance Disclosure
Performance quoted represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate, so you may have a gain or loss when shares are sold. Current performance may be higher or lower than that quoted.Effective March 20, 2015, the SPDR Gold Trust (GLD) adopted the LBMA Gold Price PM as the reference benchmark price of gold in calculating the Net Asset Value (NAV) of the Trust. Prior to that date, the Trust used the London PM Fix as the reference benchmark price in calculating the NAV.





			Fund Market Price
			
		
As of 
			07/28/2017
		




								Bid/Ask
							
						



								$120.69
							
						



								Closing Price
							
						



								$120.69
							
						



								Day High
							
						



								$120.85
							
						



								Day Low
							
						



								$120.15
							
						



								Exchange Volume (shares)
							
						



								1,410,099
							
						



								Premium/Discount
							
						



Premium/Discount to NAVPremium/Discount to NAV shows the comparison of the daily net asset value (NAV) and the Midpoint of the closing bid/ask for each of the funds calculated as ((4PM Bid/Ask - 4PM IOPV)  /  4PM IOPV * 100)




								0.02%
							
						




Premium Discount to Nav Chart




			Fund Net Asset Value
			
				

NAVMarket value of a mutual fund's and ETF's total assets, minus liabilities, divided by the number of shares outstanding



As of 
			07/28/2017
		




								LBMA Gold Price PM
							
						



								$1,264.90
							
						



								NAV
							
						



								$120.26
							
						



								Shares Outstanding
							
						



								267.70 M
							
						



								Total Net Assets
							
						



								$32,193.75 M
							
						



Most Recent NAV / NAV History
	              XLSDownload Historical Value of LBMA Gold Price PM
	                XLS




			Per Basket Information
			
		
As of 
			07/28/2017
		




								NAV Per Basket
							
						



								$12,026,056.03
							
						







Purchase InformationBuying and Selling ETFs
ETFs are flexible and easy to trade. Investors buy and sell them like stocks, typically through a brokerage account. Investors can also employ traditional stock trading techniques; including stop orders, limit orders, margin purchases, and short sales using ETFs. They are listed on major US Stock Exchanges.
ETFs are subject to risk similar to those of stocks including those regarding short-selling and margin account maintenance.
Investing in commodities entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors.
The use of short selling entails a high degree of risk, may increase potential losses and is not suitable for all investors. Please assess your financial circumstances and risk tolerance prior to short selling.
Margin trading can add to the speculative risk involved given the potential for margin calls if the price moves against the contract holder.
Ordinary brokerage commissions apply.




Performance Chart
			    
			

Get a deeper view of how an ETF's allocation to different
                            sectors, countries and market capitalizations may impact its
                            performance.

	Analyze Performance








As of
1 Month
QTD
YTD
1 Year
3 Year
5 Year
10 Year
SinceInception11/18/2004




Month End


NAV
06/30/2017
-1.92%
-0.31%
6.96%
-6.32%
-2.27%
-5.30%
6.25%
8.10%


Market Value
06/30/2017
-2.16%
-0.59%
7.67%
-6.72%
-2.68%
-5.33%
6.26%
7.98%


LBMA Gold Price PM
                                            
                                        
06/30/2017
-1.89%
-0.21%
8.41%
-5.94%
-1.88%
-4.92%
6.68%
8.53%


Quarter End


NAV
06/30/2017
-1.92%
-0.31%
6.96%
-6.32%
-2.27%
-5.30%
6.25%
8.10%


Market Value
06/30/2017
-2.16%
-0.59%
7.67%
-6.72%
-2.68%
-5.33%
6.26%
7.98%


LBMA Gold Price PM
                                            
                                        
06/30/2017
-1.89%
-0.21%
8.41%
-5.94%
-1.88%
-4.92%
6.68%
8.53%









As of
1 Month
QTD
YTD
1 Year
3 Year
5 Year
10 Year
SinceInception11/18/2004




Month End


NAV
06/30/2017
-1.92%
-0.31%
6.96%
-6.32%
-2.27%
-5.30%
6.25%
8.10%


Market Value
06/30/2017
-2.16%
-0.59%
7.67%
-6.72%
-2.68%
-5.33%
6.26%
7.98%


LBMA Gold Price PM
                                            
                                        
06/30/2017
-1.89%
-0.21%
8.41%
-5.94%
-1.88%
-4.92%
6.68%
8.53%


Quarter End


NAV
06/30/2017
-1.92%
-0.31%
6.96%
-6.32%
-2.27%
-5.30%
6.25%
8.10%


Market Value
06/30/2017
-2.16%
-0.59%
7.67%
-6.72%
-2.68%
-5.33%
6.26%
7.98%


LBMA Gold Price PM
                                            
                                        
06/30/2017
-1.89%
-0.21%
8.41%
-5.94%
-1.88%
-4.92%
6.68%
8.53%






                        Swipe to view all columns
                    



Performance Disclosure
Performance quoted represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate, so you may have a gain or loss when shares are sold. Current performance may be higher or lower than that quoted.Effective March 20, 2015, the SPDR Gold Trust (GLD) adopted the LBMA Gold Price PM as the reference benchmark price of gold in calculating the Net Asset Value (NAV) of the Trust. Prior to that date, the Trust used the London PM Fix as the reference benchmark price in calculating the NAV.
Gross Expense Ratio: 0.40%
					




Performance Graphs

Month End
Quarter End



Month End as of 06/30/2017
Fund Inception Date: 11/18/2004
Index Inception Date: 11/18/2004


<performance fundName="SPDR&lt;sup&gt;®&lt;/sup&gt; Gold Shares" bmarkName="LBMA Gold Price PM"><funds><field>1 Month</field><fund>-1.92</fund><index>-1.89</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>QTD</field><fund>-0.31</fund><index>-0.21</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>YTD</field><fund>6.96</fund><index>8.41</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>1 YR</field><fund>-6.32</fund><index>-5.94</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>3 YR</field><fund>-2.27</fund><index>-1.88</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>5 YR</field><fund>-5.30</fund><index>-4.92</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>10 YR</field><fund>6.25</fund><index>6.68</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>Inception</field><fund>8.10</fund><index>8.53</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds></performance>



Quarter End as of 06/30/2017
Fund Inception Date: 11/18/2004
Index Inception Date: 11/18/2004


<performance fundName="SPDR&lt;sup&gt;®&lt;/sup&gt; Gold Shares" bmarkName="LBMA Gold Price PM"><funds><field>1 Month</field><fund>-1.92</fund><index>-1.89</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>QTD</field><fund>-0.31</fund><index>-0.21</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>YTD</field><fund>6.96</fund><index>8.41</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>1 YR</field><fund>-6.32</fund><index>-5.94</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>3 YR</field><fund>-2.27</fund><index>-1.88</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>5 YR</field><fund>-5.30</fund><index>-4.92</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>10 YR</field><fund>6.25</fund><index>6.68</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds><funds><field>Inception</field><fund>8.10</fund><index>8.53</index><secondIndex></secondIndex><tertiaryIndex></tertiaryIndex></funds></performance>





















































Fund Documents

Fact SheetPDF

ProspectusPDF




Brochures & Guides

A Precise Way to Invest In GoldPDF






Reports & Schedules

SPDR® ETF Trading Report PDF

SPDR® ETF ListingPDF




Commentary

SPDR® Gold Shares ETF Capital Markets PerspectivePDF

Insurance Companies Migrate to Fixed Income ETFsPDF

SPDR® Gold Shares (GLD®) Quarterly DashboardPDF

2017 Investment OutlookPDF

Investing in the New AbnormalPDF

SPDR® ETF Options ReportPDF

The New Abnormal: Position for Rates, Reflation and RegimesPDF




Brochures & Guides

A Precise Way to Invest In GoldPDF





            Advisor Education
          

Investment Ideas for Heightened Market UncertaintyPDF

The Role of Gold in Today's Global Multi-Asset PortfolioPDF

Gold and Internal DynamicsPDF

Research, Outlook & ResourcesPDF

Debunking 5 Common Gold MisconceptionsPDF

What to Consider When Implementing Gold in a PortfolioPDF



= Please log in / register to access



*The ounces of gold listed on the daily barlist may differ from the ounces of gold listed as owned by SPDR® Gold Trust ("Trust") on the website due to timing differences in trading and settlement.  The barlist includes ounces of gold on a settlement date basis, while ounces shown on the website are on a trade date basis.  Effective June 1, 2011, the Trust has entered into an agreement with HSBC Bank plc, the Trust's Custodian, which will ensure that all of the Trust's gold is held in allocated form at the end of each working day. Effective July 17, 2015, the Sponsor receives a fee of 0.40% per year of the daily net asset value, or daily NAV, of the Trust, and is responsible for all ordinary fees and expenses of the Trust.Important Information Relating to SPDR Gold Trust:The SPDR Gold Trust ("GLD®") has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents GLD has filed with the SEC for more complete information about GLD and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC website at www.sec.gov or by visiting www.spdrgoldshares.com. Alternatively, the Trust will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling 1-866-320-4053.GLD is not an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (the "1940 Act") and is not subject to regulation under the Commodity Exchange Act of 1936 (the "CEA"). As a result, shareholders of the Trust do not have the protections associated with ownership of shares in an investment company registered under the 1940 Act or the protections afforded by the CEA.GLD shares trade like stocks, are subject to investment risk and will fluctuate in market value. The value of GLD shares relates directly to the value of the gold held by GLD (less its expenses), and fluctuations in the price of gold could materially and adversely affect an investment in the shares. The price received upon the sale of the shares, which trade at market price, may be more or less than the value of the gold represented by them. GLD does not generate any income, and as GLD regularly sells gold to pay for its ongoing expenses, the amount of gold represented by each Share will decline over time to that extent. Investing involves risk, and you could lose money on an investment in GLD. Please see the GLD prospectus for a detailed discussion of the risks of investing in GLD shares.Statement Regarding Forward-Looking StatementsThis document includes "forward-looking statements" which generally relate to future events or future performance. In some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as "may," "will," "should," "expect," "plan," "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "predict," "potential," "it is likely" or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. All statements (other than statements of historical fact) included in this document that address activities, events or developments that will or may occur in the future, including such matters as changes in commodity prices and market conditions (for gold and the Shares), the Trust's operations, the Sponsor's plans and references to the Trust's future success and other similar matters are forward-looking statements. Investors are cautioned that these statements are only projections. Actual events or results may differ materially. These statements are based upon certain assumptions and analyses the Sponsor made based on its perception of historical trends, current conditions and expected future developments, as well as other factors believed appropriate in the circumstances. Whether or not actual results and developments will conform to the Sponsor's expectations and predictions, however, is subject to a number of risks and uncertainties, including, the factors identified in the "Risk Factors" section of the Prospectus filed with the SEC and in other filings made by the Trust from time to time with the SEC.Consequently, all the forward-looking statements made in this material are qualified by these cautionary statements, and there can be no assurance that the actual results or developments the Sponsor or the Marketing Agent anticipates will be realized or, even if substantially realized, that they will result in the expected consequences to, or have the expected effects on, the Trust's operations or the value of the Shares. Neither the Sponsor, the Marketing Agent nor any other person assumes responsibility for the accuracy or completeness of the forward-looking statements. Neither the Trust, the Marketing Agent nor the Sponsor is under a duty to update any of the forward-looking statements to conform such statements to actual results or to reflect a change in the Sponsor's or the Marketing Agent's expectation or projections.All references to LBMA Gold Price PM are used with the permission of ICE Benchmark Administration Limited and have been provided for informational purposes only. ICE Benchmark Administration Limited accepts no liability or responsibility for the accuracy of the prices or the underlying product to which the prices may be referenced.Standard & Poor's®, S&P® and SPDR® are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (S&P); Dow Jones is a registered trademark of Dow Jones Trademark Holdings LLC (Dow Jones); and these trademarks have been licensed for use by S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC (SPDJI) and sublicensed for certain purposes by State Street Corporation. State Street Corporation’s financial products are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by SPDJI, Dow Jones, S&P, their respective affiliates and third party licensors and none of such parties make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in such product(s) nor do they have any liability in relation thereto, including for any errors, omissions, or interruptions of any index.Investing involves risk, and you could lose money on an investment in GLD. Please see the GLD prospectus for a detailed discussion of the risks of investing in GLD shares. The GLD prospectus is available by clicking here.As with all stocks, you may be required to deposit more money or securities into your margin account if the equity, including the amount attributable to your ETF shares, declines.For more information, please contact the Marketing Agent for GLD: State Street Global Advisors Funds Distributors, LLC, One Lincoln Street, Boston, MA, 02111; T: +1 866 320 4053 spdrgoldshares.com





No Team Members exists.





After Tax Returns
After-tax returns are calculated using the historical highest individual federal
              marginal income tax rates, and do not reflect the impact of state and local taxes.
              Actual after tax returns depend on the investor's tax situation and may differ from
              those shown, and the after-tax returns shown are not relevant to investors who hold
              their fund shres through tad deferred arrangements such as 401(k) plans or individual
              retiredment accounts. After tax returns may not take into account year end tax
              adjustments, which are calculated only at the end of each tax year. The after tax
              returns could differ after year end tax adjustments are accounted for.





LBMA Gold Price PM
            N/A
        


















Important Risk InformationIn general, ETFs can be expected to move up or down in value with the value of the applicable index. Although ETF shares may be bought and sold on the exchange through any brokerage account, ETF shares are not individually redeemable from the Fund. Investors may acquire ETFs and tender them for redemption through the Fund in Creation Unit Aggregations only. Please see the prospectus for more details.
 
Before investing, consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. To obtain a prospectus or summary prospectus which contains this and other information, call 1-866-787-2257, download a prospectus or summary prospectus now, or talk to your financial advisor. Read it carefully before investing.
 



Glossary







Premium Discount to NAV

            As of 
            07/28/2017
        




Ticker
NAV
Close
Bid/Ask Mid Pt
Premium/ Discount




SPDR® Gold Shares 
GLD

                        $120.26
                        
                

                        $120.69
                        
                

                        $120.69
                        
                

                        0.02%
                        
                


Download Fund Data



x axis: # of days
y axis: # Premium/Discount percentage

The above information is provided to show the comparison of the daily net asset value (NAV) and the Midpoint of the closing bid/ask for each of the funds.
Before investing, consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses. To obtain a prospectus or summary prospectus which contains this and other information, call 1-866-787-2257, download a prospectus or summary prospectus now, or talk to your financial advisor. Read it carefully before investing.












